
GOOD DOG


Part I: As the Wolf Does the Lamb
FBI Field Office: Milwaukee: 3:00PM November 2nd, 1998
“Shit”, exclaimed special agent Katrina Carter with a mild disdain, sorting through innumerable papers atop her desk. Flipping through witness testimonies, and countless photos of the crime scene with one hand and supporting her head with the other, she did not attempt to mask her displeasure. Even with the grisly scene captured from every conceivable angle, the eye witness accounts, and the collaborative efforts of the Bureau and Milwaukee Homicide, the case seemed hopeless.
“How’s it going, Kat?” inquired special agent Frank Stephenson as he approached Carter’s desk with a manila folder in hand. “Any progress with this ungodly circus?”
“Not so much”. Her reply was devoid of emphasis. It was certainly true that the case was a royal mess. Undoubtedly, the murder of a politician in a cheap hotel would encompass nearly every news story nationwide. Of course, the murder weapon being a samurai sword only served to worsen this matter. 
“Yeah, it’s still hard to believe this shit,” Frank began “I mean, Christ, it almost goes without saying that this sicko’s putting on a show. You know, right before the election and all” 
Katrina paused deliberately before responding, “Any big plans tonight?” trying to change the subject of conversation. 
“I don’t know, maybe I’ll get my dick wet. How about you?” He offered in a playful manner, made appropriate only by his seniority. 
“Same here,” joked Carter. “Say hi to the wife for me afterward. Won’t you?” Their banter served to improve Katrina’s demeanor. She smiled coyly at the suggestion of Stephenson’s infidelity. “Or maybe you could try nailing her once in a while. I’m sure she could use it.”
“My wife? What’s the point of that?”
“Shit, I don’t know,” she laughed “I thought it’d be more humane for you to satisfy your wife than to lay your insecurities on some poor stranger” 
“Hold on just a second,” Frank insisted, still maintaining the lighthearted tone of their conversation. “I’m not lying down on some couch, telling you how much I hate my mother and shit. Just because you’re more shrink than cop, doesn’t mean I want your psychoanalysis,” He finished, defending the insincere accusation with a sarcastic one of his own. 
Despite their mutual joking, Katrina could not help but find offense in the implication. “So I see we’re coming on with the shrink jokes again,” Carter offered, holding her smile and keeping with the spirit of the jesting. “We’ll I suppose I had that coming for giving my two cents. Least I could do is offer you a free session”
“Go for it”
“You’re a bitch”
Frank laughed heartily at the crude statement. “Oh yeah, how’s that?” he asked. 
“Because you can’t stop talking about getting laid” Carter responded.
“Hmm,” Frank moaned bewilderedly “I’m afraid you lost me there.”
“Well, look at it this way: If I asked some chick about when she feels closest and most intimate with her partner, what do you think she’d say?”
“I genuinely don’t give a fuck” Frank answered.
“That’s right. They almost always say they feel closest when they’re talking or holding hands or something. But men, on the other hand, always say it’s during sex.”
“Shocking”
“I know,” Katrina continued “You see, because men say they feel most intimate when they screw, it actually seems they men get more out of sex on an emotional level. You guys obsess over sex so much not only because of the act itself, but because that’s the only time you can emotionally connect with another person, you dig?”
“And also literally connect with one”
“Oh, indeed. But, that brings me back to my point. Because women are free to express intimacy in other ways, we’re not dependent on the feeling of connectedness that sex allows men. So, us gals are actually more about the fucking aspect, while you dudes bring more of that emotional shit,” she paused, letting Frank absorb that sentiment for a moment “You’re a bitch,” she concluded. 
For a brief instant, Stephenson mulled over the idea that he was a bitch because he liked to get laid, before coming to his own conclusion that Katrina was fucking with him. 
“You know,” he started, barely containing his amusement “Aside from how you just proved my point by actually analyzing me, you’re long ass story almost made me forget why I came over here in the first place.” With a grin wide enough to eat all the shit in the world, he purposefully slapped down the manila folder on her desk. 
“What’s this?” Carter asked.
“Kat, today is your motherfucking birthday”
Opening the folder, Katrina’s eyes lit up in awe of what they beheld. 
“This just got here,” Frank explained “I guess some poor bastard was either brave enough or crazy enough to offer a description of our dear friend, J-Bird.”
“Christ, I thought we’d never turn the hotel manager around” Carter exclaimed
“Actually,” Frank interjected “we haven’t. This came from an MPD informant. The manager still ain’t talking, and I can’t say I blame him either. From what we’ve gathered, it seems Mr. Bird and his friends have some serious reach. God help whoever this CI is” His grim statement served to end their friendly exchange. With a final ponderous look toward Carter, special agent Stephenson took his leave. 
Glaring over the sketch, Katrina thought it peculiar how strange the illustration seemed. After all the demonizing news coverage, exhaustive casework, and speculative storytelling as to the man’s actions, it didn’t seem fitting to put a face to this killer. After hearing so much of his deeds without knowing what he looked like, one’s imagination was liable to run wild. How strange, she thought, that he didn’t look like she remembered him, despite having never actually seen him. 
She thought he would be more imposing. Indeed, he looked rather terrifying but not in the way a monster ought to. His face was rather severe, with an angular outline and bold eyebrows. The eyes. In the eyes, it became apparent that the artist took some unusual liberties with the sketch. It didn’t really seem like a police sketch at all. There was too much in the eyes. They looked sad, actually; but in an impersonal way, as if he knew more about something than he ought to. These sad eyes, Katrina thought, were what was so scary about the drawing; not because they had sadness, but because they were missing something else that she couldn’t quite place. 
As the realization came to mind, whatever monster she had conjured with her imagination was readily replaced by the real monster. What scared her so much about J-Bird’s eyes was that they were filled with understanding but completely devoid of forgiveness. 

*My head movie version: The screen goes black. In thick white lines, a rabid, snarling wolf appears against the black background facing directly at the viewer. He has a broken chain tied around his neck, as if some poor bastard had tried and failed to keep him chained up. The chain hangs down, with one of the links forming the “O” in dog as “Good Dog” appears beneath him. Whole Lotta Love starts playing, because fuck yea it does* 

Emily Henderson’s Apartment: 10:45AM October 31st, 1998.  
	Water droplets condensed across each tile as the hot shower steam caressed the walls of Emily Henderson’s bathroom. The mirror and the glass shower panels were densely shrouded by the warm vapors. Pressing firmly against the glass, Emily’s back was all that was visible through the fogged doors. The rhythmic moaning of the coital pair was all that was audible over the running water. 


Emily Henderson’s Apartment: 10:55AM October 31st, 1998
	A man with sad eyes was sitting on the edge of Emily’s bed, watching the local news. Having just satisfied his sexual hunger with intercourse, he now tried to manage his actual hunger with Lucky Charms. 
	“Wrapping up this morning’s broadcast,” the newswoman boasted with an enthusiasm that belonged nowhere on the former side of noon “In light of these corruption allegations, recent polls suggest congressman Carter will likely lose…”
	“Poor Herman,” J-Bird jested of the congressman, chewing on the marshmallow bits he had strategically saved for last. “Always the politician”
	“Hey, Sorry I don’t have anything else to eat,” Emily exclaimed from the bathroom, before spitting out toothpaste.  
	“Oh, that’s ok,” Bird lied, the cereal failing to soothe his perpetual hang over. He then changed the channel, not interested in a tale of political corruption with which he had first-hand familiarity. After scanning over the morning programing and unsurprisingly finding nothing suitable for his viewership, J slurped down the last bits and addressed the matter at large. “Say, do you know if there’s any good diner’s around here? Or like a Denny’s or some shit?”
	“Yeah, I figured you wouldn’t be satisfied,” Emily shouted over her hairdryer. “At least not with the cereal,” she continued, realizing the effect of this euphemism was probably lessened by her yelling. “There’s a pancake house over on Main Street, actually. We could head there if you want.” 
	“Goddammit,” Bird mumbled to himself, lamenting over his inquiry.
	Putting down the dryer in favor of a brush, Emily reminisced about the prior night. “You know, I don’t usually do stuff like this,” she giggled. “Hooking up with a guy I just met. It’s just that, you seemed like such a nice guy at that bar. You didn’t hit on me like an asshole or anything” The shroud of mist finally cleared from her mirror to reveal a face red with embarrassment. Yes, it was not usual of her to have one night stands, nor was it of her to talk so openly with new people. “So Mark, what do you say about pancakes?” she asked, heading into the living room. 
	J-Bird did not respond to her. Rather, he could not respond, seeing as how he had leapt out the window a minute ago. Emily’s face reddened no longer with embarrassment but with anger as she screamed “MOTHERF-

	-UCKER!!!”. 
J found it amusing how the scream coincided near perfectly with Robert Plant’s singing as he turned on the radio in his car *Head movie: Whole Lotta Love picks up where it left off after the opening credits ended* While taking a moment to consider the day ahead of him, he rediscovered a nearly empty fifth of whiskey on the floor of the passenger side. The idea of finishing the bottle was almost repulsive, as his hang over was more intense than usual.
Bottle now in hand, Bird pondered the meeting he had to have with Herman. How strange, he thought, to hear about the man’s alleged corruption on the news while seeing through the bullshit at the same time. Indeed, if those empty suits knew half as much about the congressman as Bird did, they’d have enough dirt to fill up a fucking decade of air time. Such thoughts continued to pass through J’s head as the last bit of liquor passed into his stomach. Now, looking for a place to discard the empty bottle, he was surprised to find his gaze met by a mailman. The man, of course, looked appalled by Bird’s wildly irresponsible behavior. 
Not sure of how long the postal worker was watching him drink whiskey in a running car, Bird felt only slightly ashamed. The words “you’re an asshole” were visibly mouthed by the mailman, and this conclusion was affirmed as the bottle smashed against the side of his truck.  
	


The Nobody Gives a Shit What the Name is Diner: 11:15AM, October 31st
	Rachael White sat alone in a booth dwelling on her misfortune, specifically the misfortune of ever having met her ex-boyfriend. Before they broke up, he was always saying how much he cared about her, saying how much it meant for him to be with her, saying he loved her. The memory of these words, which was once a pleasant comfort, was now a devastating reminder to the falsehood of their relationship. To learn of his betrayal, was to change the words into knives which cut out her heart and left her empty. So, it would seem that despite their years together, Rachael was worth nothing more to the man she had loved than a single message:
*Here will be inserted the message (as if it’s dialogue) from the ex-boyfriend. Basically, the point will be to flesh out her character, draw sympathy from the reader, and all that jive*  
	It was all she could do to hold back tears and stare blankly at her uneaten meal. Eating out alone was uncommon for Rachael. But, after a number of coworkers learned of her break-up, too many of them felt it necessary to console her, so she decided a private lunch break was preferable over their pity. Just as she tried to focus on something less bothersome, her wish was afforded to her with the most unusual of sounds. 
	A deep, bellowing voice trumpeted across the parking lot outside. Rachael peered out through the window at the approaching source. As the man came nearer, the Italian lyrics and dramatic melody could be recognized. Indeed the man was singing opera, or at least trying, as he failed to hit most notes. However, his attempt seemed far from genuine, as his hammy annunciation and obvious self-amusement made clear. Just before he reached the front doors, he caught her staring through the window at him. She turned away reactively. For the first time in days, Rachael managed a smile as she realized her own absurdity. After all, why did she have to be embarrassed? He was the one doing weird shit. 
	The singing stopped as the doors opened and the strange man was seated at a table adjacent to Rachael. His straight face and now business-like demeanor offered no acknowledgement of the clownish behavior. Rachael found this peculiarly attractive, as she admired his not laughing at his own overt foolishness. God, she thought, how unbecoming of her to swoon over a possibly crazy stranger.   
	Minutes passed, the man ordered his breakfast, and did not manage a single look towards Rachael. This was most odd, as Rachael was positive that he had seen her staring through the window before. A lot of men, she generalized, would jump at such a chance to hit on her. Another minute, and a short stack arrived at the man’s table. 
	“I figured pancakes were a safe bet,” he finally remarked, still not looking towards her. “Seeing as how the omelets aren’t very good, apparently” 
	“I’m sorry?” she asked.
	“You haven’t had more than a couple bites” he answered. 
	“Oh yea,” she forced a laugh. Rachael had momentarily forgotten about the entrée before her, now quite colder but just as intact as when it arrived. “I guess I’m just not hungry” 
	At last, the man faced her. His eyes met hers, making it clear he wanted to say something. The eyes, there was something very unusual about his eyes.
	“My name’s Dave,” said J-Bird. 


*Below this is a comic portion that picks up on a close up of J-Bird. Illustrated by Michael Marini (the real J-Bird McCoy)*




*Haven’t been able to coordinate more pages out of Marini so I said fuck it, might as well try drawing it myself.*
*The comic portion continues with J making himself a screwdriver. A caption shows a close up of him pouring vodka into the orange juice, but in the next, it starts overflowing. The next panel “zooms out” showing a confused expression on J’s face. Zooming out even further, you see that J has discovered the impaled congressmen-elect tied to a chair in the center of the room*

“Shitballs,” J remarked under his breath, surprised but somehow not startled. Indeed, this was not a scene he was anticipating. 
Drink in hand, he steadily approached the body. A crimson shadow stained the carpet beneath. Bird made no closer than two paces of the bloody perimeter before stopping to examine it. After a sip of his drink, he reasoned the man had been dead for a few hours due to the dryness of the stain. He inwardly protested as to how the hell this could have happened without his recollection. Certainly, despite his nearly constant inebriation, such an exotic incident would have left a mark on his memory. Face grimacing, fingers running forcibly over his own scalp, J-Bird grew increasingly annoyed as the nature of his situation became apparent. 
Quickly but quietly, J walked over to the bed.  The girl’s breathing revealed precisely what he had feared. She was still alive. Taking a moment to evaluate how fucked he might be, Bird considered his options. Of these, there was only one reasonable course of action. Gently lifting a pillow off of the bed, he held it against his chest and stared thoughtfully at the sleeping woman. Indeed, it was the lady he had met at the diner: Rachael or something. 
	Damn, J thought, this would be easier if he didn’t know her. Of course, he didn’t really know her, except in the biblical sense. However, Bird had never killed a woman before and he thought it a shame to bust his cherry like this. Extending the pillow, he remarked how beautiful she looked. Her hair flowing sideways, her lips parted slightly, temptingly, it was very much a shame to rid the world of this sight. But this was not a time for sentiments, J-Bird insisted to himself, now was a time for self-preservation. With the pillow mere inches from her face, Rachael let out a soft sigh, a cry out from the farthest of dreams. 
	Fuck me; J relented, tossing the pillow to the side of the still breathing woman. He had to find another way. Remarking the smell of liquor from her breath and the slowness of her breathing, J concluded that the woman was very much intoxicated and was not likely to wake for hours
 
	
Milwaukee Police Department: 4:15 PM, November 1st
	Sargent Tom Brannock slouched down, sitting in an interrogation room of the Milwaukee Police department. He ran his fingers down from his scalp and over his face, as if trying to wake himself from the ungodly nightmare in which he was now immersed. Despite his frustration, it was all he could do to keep from laughing at the utter absurdity of these circumstances; although, he made sure to hide his existential amusement from his present company. Across from him sat the witness and chief suspect, Rachael White, and to his right sat FBI agent Katrina Carter who silently jotted notes.
	“Let me get this straight, Ms. White” Tom continued, regaining his composure “You meet this guy Dave over at the Whogivesashit yesterday morning. Things hit off. Sparks fly. So, you meet up again at Obrien’s at ten PM, and some heavy drinking ensues. Then, sometime between one and one thirty, he takes you to the Amici hotel where drinking continues and things get physical. Haziness turns to blackness, and next thing you know you’ve got an arm full dope and Dave replaced by a dead stranger tied to a chair. Is that the gist of it?”
	“Yes” Rachael answered quietly and emptily. Face pale, eyes red, it was all she could manage to hold her head up off the table. 
	“Please excuse me, but I have to say that’s pretty damn outlandish” Brannock asserted.
	“I already told you I know nothing about the man in the chair” Rachael pleaded without any trace of confidence, her voice cracking. She held on desperately to her side of table, as if she would fall off the earth upon release “He must have given me that stuff when I was out. God, I would never do anything like this. Please believe-”
	“Actually, I do believe you” Brannock calmly interjected with his palms flat and still atop his side of the table “Looking at your clean background, it’s hard to imagine you having a willful part in this. But, this is still a pretty bizarre scenario and we’ve hardly even begun to make sense of this mess, so unfortunately we can’t rule anything out.” 
	If this was any reassurance to Rachael, she offered no sign of it as she stared downward. Another tear plopped into the already sizable puddle beneath her face. Tom stole a glance towards his left, giving a nonverbal queue for Katrina to offer something of her own. But, Katrina only continued to glance over her notes. Her expression was stern, but cool and collected, with her fingers moving only slightly and purposefully as she flipped through her notepad. Goddamn feds, Brannock thought, they all maintain this image of cold professionalism. It was the least Carter could do to offer this poor girl some comfort. It would mean so much more coming from someone less intimidating than himself. 
	“Can we get you something else?” Tom asked of Rachael as softly and comfortingly as a man like him could manage. “Another coffee maybe? A sandwich? I know it’s probably the last thing on your mind, after the night you had and all. But, trust me, eating something will do ya wonders; clear some of that junk out of your blood”
 	She offered no response. Tom alternated his glance, back and forth, between the women. Both kept staring downward, Katrina at her notes, and Rachael at her abysmal despair. 
	“Well. I think we’ve got enough for now” Tom announced “Some other officers will be in here shortly; ask you a few more questions. Unfortunately, I don’t know how long we’re gonna have to keep you. I’m afraid you’ve gotten mixed up with a pretty dangerous crowd. Just hang tight.”
	With that, Tom and Katrina stood up and took their leave. Tom closed the door slowly and gingerly, as if trying not to wake an infant. Rachael’s forlorn gaze never broke from the table. 
	Tom began down the hallway, his pace purposefully faster than Agent Carter’s. The show now over, his calm expression gave way to an impatient grimace. 
	“You know you shouldn’t have told her that” Carter stated calmly, as a matter of fact. Her pace too, was quick and deliberate, except she seemed to glide effortlessly. She made no effort to keep up with Brannock.
	“Oh, now she speaks” Tom accused, still continuing ahead.
	“Telling her about the ‘dangerous crowd’ and what not; how do you expect her to give up anything now?”
	“Give what up?” Tom stopped abruptly in his tracks. But he did not turn around. He merely allowed Carter to catch up with him. “With how doped up she was, her description of this asshole would be so fucked, it would do us more harm than good. I’m better off doing my own digging, rather than sitting around waiting for her to give up how this guy likes his pancakes”
	“A little presumptive, aren’t we?” Carter suggested. She spoke softly but confidently, her expression as mellow as it had been in the interrogation room “For all we know. We’ll catch a tip about some hitter who only eats banana pancakes and likes to fuck with his socks on or some other weird bullshit. I know you’re not an idiot, detective. We can’t know what info’s good until it helps us or not. Don’t fuck up the case just cause you wanna be all chivalrous and shit”
	“Now who’s presumptive?” Tom gave back, but with a tone devoid of any accusation. This genuinely being his first time speaking with her, Tom admired how blunt she was and couldn’t help but crack a smile through his game face “Who says this guy’s a hit man? Or that he actually even killed the guy? If it’s really like that, why didn’t he just kill her too? Kind of dumb to go through the trouble of offing a politician just to leave a witness breathing”
	“You talk to the manager yet?” Carter asked.
	“No”
	“Well, he’s wasn’t exactly generous with his story etither” Katrina explained “No description. And the camera in the lobby very conveniently stopped working a couple days ago”
	“Well, those Amici pricks are mob. Maybe he’s in on it”
	“In his own hotel? Nigga, please.” Katrina dismissed the suggestion, offering a coy smile of her own “Besides, the bureau’s got good word that Tony’s clean. Well, clean for an Amici anyway. Nah, he was just scared as shit”
	“I’d be pretty fucking startled too if this kind of bullshit wound up in my place” Tom offered, his aggression now waning as their bickering gave way to constructive discussion.
	“Indeed” Katrina admitted “But that’s not the kind of scared that I saw. We’re talking about a fool brave enough to turn down the mob, and still live in the same city, but pisses himself all ‘cause of this Dave motherfucker”
	“You don’t think Tony was bullshitting?” Tom inquired.
	“I don’t” She answered “Tony didn’t even say this shit. He just says that the guy came over to his counter and asked if the camera’s working. Tony tells him no. Then the dude asks if Tony’s a dog or a wolf”
	“Uh, what?” Tom asked, confused. 
	“Yea” Katrina insisted “Just out of the fucking blue, our boy starts telling Tony about dogs and wolves; about how wolves fought for what was rightly theirs but only to wind up with spears in their necks, while dogs obeyed and got to live peacefully. Some really weird shit. But, as Tony’s running through this, I can see it in his eyes. Tony had the fear of God all up in him”
	“Damn” Tom remarked “So were supposed to look for some kind of fucking philosopher who gets shitfaced and takes out politicians with eighteenth century weapons I guess. Aren’t we fucking lucky? We’ll need a goddamn bulldozer to clear through this cosmic shit burrito of a case”


Herman Carter’s House: 8:45PM, October 31st
	Congressman Herman Carter sat in the game room of his luxurious home, playing poker with three of his high-society friends. *So, this dude is basically Clay Davis from “The Wire”, in like every way. He looks, sounds, and acts like him. I don’t care how much of a rip-off it is. That guy was a partial inspiration for this story even in its earliest stages* A mounted polar bear head faced the poker table from over a massive fire place, staring towards the four powerful men with a look as contemptuous as it was impotent. The fire crackled, raging gloriously underneath it. 
	“Well, Herman” Mayor John Ashburn laughed “Let’s hope you have better luck with the primaries than you’ve had with your hands tonight”
	“Shit, son” Herman retorted playfully. “I’ve got a better chance with my wife tonight than I do with the vote”
	The other two laughed raucously at the statement, through fat Cuban cigars. 
	“I suppose it’s not enough for me catch shit from those damn vultures in the media” Herman jested, while dealing out the next hand “She’s just gotta get her licks in too”
	“I feel for ya” the mayor offered, with a tone of greater courtesy than of sincerity. 
	“Shit” Herman went on “You know I ain’t half as bad as they say. I mean, I’ve got my hands in some pockets, sure. But that’s the game, baby”
	“Damn straight” the mayor replied automatically, not looking up from his cards “You’re no more sideways than any other man I’ve met in office”
	“Goddamn right” Herman saluted, now turning to face the mayor “Half of these motherfuckers are so crooked: you point them south, they end up in Jersey”
	While his company laughed at his musings, Herman’s attention was drawn towards the back door, in which his bodyguard was entering. He alerted Herman with a slight nod. 
	“Sorry guys, looks like we’ve gotta call this one” Herman apologized “I’ve got some business to attend to” 
	“Alright,” the mayor said, the party standing up “No need for excuses. It’s fine if you’ve had enough of an ass kicking. Tell your wife I said hi”
	“I’ll do no such thing, motherfucker” Herman laughed as he walked his friends towards the front door. 
He bid them farewell as a new guest entered from the back way. Herman turned, unsurprised to find the man already behind the bar, making himself and old fashioned. 
“Hey, man” Herman greeted him “While you’re making yourself all at home and what not, make me one of those shits while you’re at it”
Herman sat back down at the poker table as his guest approached with the drinks in hand. The man moved steadily and without urgency, not at all like an invited guest, as if he owned the place as much as Herman did. Wordlessly, the man placed the old fashions down, joining Herman at a seat across from him. 
“Well, it’s nice to see you too, you cheerful motherfucker” Herman joked.
J-Bird took a long sip of his drink before answering “Indeed it is”
“You, know” Carter smiled, his amusement obvious “That’s why I like you J. As someone who spends his time arguing with politicians, and overly talkative assholes of the like, It’s refreshing as hell to deal with a man who’s all business.”
“How flattering” J responded dryly. His drink already half finished, J looked over towards the fire place. 
“Speaking of which,” Carter removed a few folded up papers from his coat pocket “Business is pretty serious this time around. We’re having sort of a disagreement with the Amici’s” He slid the papers over to J.
“A disagreement?” J asked with a nonchalance that skimmed the shores of complete boredom. He unfolded the papers methodically. 
“Yea. They seem to think they can make and sell meth in my town. I disagree”
J scanned the papers, on which there was information on a residential building including the address and construction blueprints. He studied the information without any visible intrigue, periodically stealing glances towards the fire. 
“It’s not exactly a huge operation. The place is way over on the west side, pretty far from the family.” Herman explained.
“Trying not to shit where they eat, I see” J offered, his attention still on the blueprints.
 “Right. They’ve just started up, only about half a dozen men are there at any given time. The thing is: my boy says the lab’s in the basement, which is locked down tighter than a Mormon school girl. Heavy steel doors, and the works. You’ll have to get them to open it for you. I trust you can be persuasive”
“So, I take it the lab’s the main target” J finished his drink “not the Amici’s”
“Precisely. Amici’s got this Ma and Pa type meth operation in his pocket. But the dudes actually working their ain’t blood” Herman assured him “I’m not starting a war. They crossed a line, and they’ll know it when I send them the Italian special”
“I accept” J-Bird stood up as the flames started to taunt him. 
“Right on, brother” Herman exclaimed, while J walked towards the fire place “I’ve got a Lincoln and some gauges for ya. And seven of my top guys”
“No” J Bird countered “That’ll be too messy. I only need one” He threw the papers in the fire. 
“One!” Herman was taken aback “I know you dig this commando shit and what not. But I trust eight niggas better than two, motherfucker”
“You shouldn’t” J stated calmly, watching the papers dance among the flames. A sudden, slight tremor shot down his arm. He clenched his fist to keep it at bay.
“Man, like I said” Herman emphasized “It’ll just be a few dudes down there. But the shit is locked down, son. You’ll be storming the fucking castle and shit”
“For a job like this. The one right man is all I need” The dance ended as the papers ceased their existence. Both arms unsteady now, J bit down into his cheek. He could just turn away from the fire, but J knew that would be wrong. The flames were great and terrible, but they were also truth. To look away would be a lie, so J had to face them boldly. “I’ll get the Doctor” 

Jennifer Delanie’s house: 9:30 AM, November 1st
A radio clock sat atop a side table. Adjacent to it was an ashtray that could hardly contain the absurd volume of cigarette butts and roaches within it. Next to the table lied a couch with a sleeping, portly man splayed across it. Atop that man was an equally sleeping but distractingly gorgeous woman. 
In a disgustingly clichéd manner, the alarm went off. But, instead of an alarm, “Shimmy, Shimmy Ya” by Ol’ Dirty Bastard played; which is not a cliché, so fuck all of you. The slightest of smiles became visible on the man’s face. Still utterly asleep, he was not consciously aware that the song was playing in any regard. But somehow, inexplicably, his soul knew that something was very right with universe at this moment.
The woman stirred awake, and leaned across the man to turn off the radio. Eerily, the smile faded the moment she did. She then nudged him, prompting him to come forth into consciousness. Reluctantly, he did.
“Oh hey, it’s you” he greeted her.
“Morning, babe” She offered with a smile so wide, it was almost offensive. “Last night was so great. I can hardly believe it”
“Yep” he offered, his eyes now closed again, readjusting himself on the couch. 
“I just, wow” she kept going “Please don’t think I’m too forward, but I just have to say this is so crazy. You said and did all the right things. Oh, God. You’re probably gonna think I’m, like, clingy now. But, honestly, it’s like you could read my mind. What’s it been, like, three days straight now? Fucking nuts, right?”
“Mmm” he grunted, not entirely listening.
“I’ve never done anything like this before. I mean, how…” She stopped herself. She knew she was being too forthright, and didn’t want to put him off because of it. But, he just lied there indifferently. After a minute or so, she turned on the TV.
“…Carter was corrupt but no one could have predicted…” The douche-y news pundit boasted, as the man finally sat up.
“What time is it?” he asked
“Like, nine thirty-ish” she informed him
“Yea, I should probably head out” He stood up.
“Where you headed?” she inquired
“There’s work to be done” He stated truthfully, getting dressed.
“Well, aren’t you eloquent” she giggled “Oh wait. I never got your number, actually”
“Oh, uhm. I’m between places right now and there’s this whole deal with…” He could see the disappointment well up in her eyes. She hid it very well. Most people wouldn’t see it. But the Doctor was not most people. 
“Can we just talk about this” she insisted
“Yea, I was gonna grab a bite before work. So, I guess if I ate hear, we could talk for a bit” Doc said with a calm and entirely reassuring tone.
“Um. Ok, yea. What do you-”
“Pancakes. Blueberry.”

Jennifer Delanie’s house: 9:50 AM, November 1st.
	Doc finished off the last bite of the stack, as Jennifer sat across from him at her kitchen table, waiting impatiently for him to say something.
	Wiping his chin, he finally began the discussion with “Yea, so I’m gonna go now”

In front of Jennifer Delanie’s house: 9:52 AM, November 1st
	Walking briskly down the street, the doctor recited Shimmy Shimmy Ya to himself, entirely unaware that he had heard it a few minutes ago, while withdrawing a very sizable joint from his coat pocket. Reaching the bench at the corner, he toked largely and unabashedly in front of a woman who was already there. 
	The woman made her disapproval apparent, with a stern accusatory stare, while Doc made it equally apparent that her effort was wasted, as he paid her no mind. There was only silence, except for Doc’s toking, and the sprinkler behind him.
	The woman started coughing loudly at him, despite her being outdoors and willfully moving closer to his smoking in order to make her point. He did not acknowledge this in any way.
	“This is everybody’s air, you know?” she said suddenly and incorrectly. But, Doc just kept ignoring her.
	“It’s not fair for you to stand there and make me breathe your poison” she insisted, her outrage magnifying. But still her silence was only answered by the indifferent sounds of Doc’s toking and the sprinkler in the yard behind them.
	“Alright, buddy. I didn’t want to do this. But, I’m calling the cops” She pulled out a big ass 90’s cell phone from her purse, as Doc finally reacted. He started to walk off, but still without looking towards her or otherwise admitting her presence. A victorious smirk appeared across the woman’s face. However, this expression immediately transformed into confusion as Doc walked into the yard instead of down the sidewalk. 
	“What do think you’re do-” she started but could not finish; as Doc had finally acknowledged her, spraying her in the face with the hose. Absolutely astonished, it took her a moment to even grasp her situation before she started running off. But, momentarily disoriented, she tripped and fell onto the pavement. 
	Doc reactively stopped spraying and took a few steps towards her. On the ground, clutching her knee she looked up to find a very concerned and guilty look on Doc’s face as he came closer. This of course made it all the more surprising as Doc just started spraying her from a much closer distance. She ran off soaking. Doc kept on smoking.
	“It’s nobody’s air, bitch” He decreed softly, twisting the hose back into the sprinkler. 
	Just then, a Lincoln Continental pulled up to the corner. The passenger window rolled down to reveal a very serious face. Doc greeted it with the very slightest of nods, stomping out his roach.
	“Get in, fool” J-Bird insisted while igniting a joint of his own. 

A parking lot near some busted up houses in west Milwaukee: 1:30 AM, November 2nd 
	The night was starless and still. 
At the far side of the parking lot, a stray Labrador gnawed around the periphery of a tin can, empty but for a sewer rat housed within. Now pawing at the can, the dog managed to flip it over, ejecting the rat outward and onto the bare pavement. Quickly and eagerly, the scrawny beast claimed his prize, and the rat was devoured by its hopelessly superior foe.
 At the near side of the lot, J-Bird and Dr. Swan sat in the Lincoln, across from their target. They cautiously and thoroughly observed the goings on around the gang’s house, with their silence broken only by the Gameboy.
	“What the fuck?” J protested “A critical hit? It’s super effective?! Ah, fuck me” J gave up, tossing the children’s game to the floor of the car while passing the joint over to Doc. 
	“Calm your shit” Doc implored, with his gaze still focused towards the front door of the house, as it had been for several hours now. Doc and J had diligently observed the gang’s patterns. As such, the gang had switched the front lookout every two hours on the hour. Also, at any given time once night had fallen, within few minutes intervals, there would always be at least one or two of them who would walk out through the back cellar doors for a smoke break. 
	“Alright,” Doc began, holding in a sizable toke “I think we’re ready to move, just before this guy switches with the next lookout”. He expelled the toke, and the J went back to J.
	“Indeed” J agreed, before taking his own drag. Their strategy was to take out as many as they could, quickly and quietly, before having to bust into the basement lab, which served as a stronghold. The best way to do this, J and Doc reasoned, was to attack when they could take out two guards at once (the present one and the one about to take over for the next shift) and when there was at least two men outside at the back. 
	“The bum run should suit well,” J continued while smoke billowed from his nose. J now stared thoughtfully at the doorman as well. But, his look matched Doc’s only in its direction rather than its intention. Doc’s gaze was as one would ponder a math problem, calculative and emotionally indifferent; whereas J’s was more severe. J looked upon the doorman as the wolf does the lamb. 


1:57AM, in front of the Meth Lab house, November 2nd 
	Andy Moretti stood watch in front of the meth house. Leaning back against the door, arms crossed, his body offered a slight shiver in defiance of the cold night. Indeed, he had left his jacket in the basement, but his pride forbade him from admitting his mistake and going back to retrieve it. Regardless, in only a couple minutes, Ricky would take over the lookout and relieve Andy of his duties. Moving his head only slightly, Andy’s eyes panned slowly across the street, cautious for any abnormality. At that moment, the scene was clear, except for a ragged vagrant approaching from Andy’s right. 
	“Aaayyy, mulafuckaaa!” the bum greeted him while stumbling down the near sidewalk, before taking a swig from his beer bottle. 
	Rolling his eyes, Andy responded with an impatient sigh. Indeed, he did not want to deal with this bullshit when his shift was almost over. 
	The bum tripped and fell, knocking over a trash can in front of the adjacent house. He then tried to stand up, but was only successful on his third attempt. 
	“Ay, man,” the bum slurred, now headed towards Andy “You see Joey? You tol’ him ‘bout the thing, right?” Of course, Andy did not know this man, nor did he have any intention of meeting him. But, the bum was clearly shitfaced beyond reason. Andy knew there was no point in arguing with him. So, Andy stared straight ahead, hoping the bum would walk away of his own volition. 
	“Ay, man” the bum repeated, before taking another swig from his bottle “I love you, dude. Come here, man” The bum threw his head back, offering the sloppiest of smiles. He was now very near the stoop on which Andy stood above. 
	“Back off, man” Andy threatened, still facing away from the vagrant.
	Again, the bum tripped and fell as he reached the steps. His body splayed across the stoop, the bottle smashed against the top step. The bum rose to his knees, the bottle neck still clutched in his right hand, and started dry heaving towards Andy’s feet. 
	“Goddamn it” Andy protested under his breath. He bent down, intending to throw the bum off the stoop. But, the instant he laid his hands on the filthy, booze soaked jacket, the bum leapt upward and swiped the bottle neck below Andy’s chin, adding a crimson streak to the front door. 
	The bum moved with precision and fluidity, like a coiled rattle snake. By the time Andy realized what was happening, he was already on his back with the bum holding him down. He reached for his pistol, but it was already removed. Andy struggled futilely, staring viciously at his killer. The man returned the stare with an unfaltering boldness. Indeed, this man was no bum. Andy had been fooled by a professional. Son of a bitch, Andy failed to say in his last moment. But the sentiment was not wasted, as the killer was indeed a bastard of the highest degree.  
After relieving the doorman of his key, J-Bird stood up and tossed the body behind the bushes in front of the stoop. He then matted his hair down and disposed of the hobo jacket as well. Of course, those last two measures were not vital to his objective, but if the job were to go wrong, J preferred to leave a handsome corpse in his wake. 
His pistol withdrawn, J cautiously opened the front door.
(Start comic portion)

*J opens the door with his pistol in hand (like a cop would)
*He sees the room is clear
*J scopes the scene, his eyes squinted, contemplating
*He looks towards the couch
*(cut to the back of the house, just around the corner where the cellar doors are), two thugs are having a smoke break (they’re kind of half facing each other and half facing the same way, which is away from the house)
*Doc jumps out from around the corner and puts his 12-gauge around thug1’s neck (from behind him. Doc has his left hand on the handle and his right on the barrel)
*Doc breaks thug1’s neck and, in the same motion, points the gun at thug9, who’s reaching for his pistol
*Thug9 raises his hands in surrender. He has a subtly frightened look (he’s trying to hide it) on his face, with his cigarette dangling precariously from his mouth.
*(Cut to the living room) Thug2 opens the door from the basement, intending to relieve the doorman of his duties
*(Fairly close side view, facing the TV wall) Thug2 walks towards the front door with a disinterested “business as usual” type look on his face
*Same angle but panned out, we see that J-Bird is a couple steps behind him in a staggered stance. J-Bird has his Brock Samson knife out, and a look that’s even more “business as usual” than thug2. 
*(I suppose you could add one or two panels showing J stepping in unison with thug2, but taking wider steps to catch up with him)
*(View that’s basically right from the front door) Just before thug2 reaches the door, we see J’s hands (knife hand and free hand) about to wrap around thug2’s neck. Thug2 is, as of yet, unaware that they’re inches from his face.
*(Cut to outside) Doc is still pointing his 12 gauge, as thug9 nervously unlocks the cellar doors.
*(Cut to the hallway) Having dispatched with thug2, and withdrawn his pistol in favor of his knife, J approaches the basement door (he’s moving like a cop again. His stance should embody professionalism) 
*J bangs loudly on the door, alerting the gang below
*(Cut to basement) Thugs 3-8 jolt their heads up to face the door (Thug8 is breaking up the ice when he hears the banging, closest to our perspective. He’s the main cook, and looks the least thuggish) 
*Thugs 3-7 rush towards the gun rack. 
*They tool up. Thugs 3 and 4 grab shotguns, while 5-7 grab AK’s
*Thugs 3 and 4 move cautiously up the stairs, while 5-7 assume positions near the base of the stairs, with their AK’s pointed up at the basement door (except for 5, who’s pointing towards the cellar doors)
*Thug3 slowly and nervously cracks open the door (It’s a heavy steel door).
*He sees nobody there
*Thugs 3 and 4 creep softly through the door, heading towards the living room
*(The same angle, but panning back) We see the door on the far left of the hallway is slightly open
*(Cut to the basement) Thugs 5-7 hear shots and dudes crying out. 
*(Close up on thug6’s face) He’s nervous as hell, very on edge
*Something grabs all of their attention towards the cellar doors. Someone is coming in.
*With their guns all pointed towards him, thug9 comes around the corner from the cellar stairs
*Thug9 raises his hands like “woah, dudes. It’s me. Chill out”
*Their expressions relax slightly
*They all turn away and point up towards the basement door again 
*(With the same angle, panning back) We see that Doc is a few feet from thug9, just around the corner of the cellar stairs
*Doc jumps out and>
*Fires his 12 gauge in 3 rapid successions (Like those redneck trick shots who can shoot down like 6 targets in two seconds. Again, I don’t really know how best to draw this. Probably need a few panels) dropping thugs 5-7. (So now the unarmed 8 and 9 are the only ones left)
*J-Bird walks casually down the stairs with his pistol swinging lazily at his side. With his other hand, he’s lighting a joint.
(End comic portion)
(Yea, so that wasn’t as dramatic as the other fight scenes. But that’s kind of my intention. This is supposed to illustrate how “high caliber” J and Doc are: that they can just take out a bunch of heavily armed gangsters in like a minute with little effort)
	
	As he reached the bottom of the stairs, J-Bird sized up the basement through squinted eyes. Smoke blew forcefully from his mouth and nostrils while Doc strolled around to the three fallen gangsters. As he neared each one, a single blast of the 12 gauge was enough to finish them off. 
	The two remaining gangsters lied with their hands and knees on the basement floor. They could not help but flinch with each thunderous crack of Doc’s shotgun. Neither of them dared to look up. 
	“How many did you get?” J-Bird casually asked of Doc, as one would inquire about the weather.
	“Four” Doc responded after finishing off the last gunman. 
	“Same here,” J offered back “Shit, so there were ten of these fools? (doorman included) Fuckin’ Carter. So much for half a dozen”
 J pulled up a chair from the workstation and dragged it to the middle of the room. He sat down facing the two kneeling men. After a deliberate pause, J introduced himself with “Alright, so who’s the chef?”
	The gangsters did not respond, nor did they look up. One of them shook slightly, unable to hide his fearful contemplation.
	“Come on, speak up” J continued, with his voice soft and reassuring “I promise I won’t hurt you”
	The cook gave a quick and uneasy look towards his lone partner before responding “He is”. Desperate and guilty thoughts ran through the cook’s head before Doc painted them across the floor. 
	“Five” Doc bragged.
	“Oh” J continued to the one remaining gangster, maintaining his friendly tone “I can’t really promise anything about the Doctor, however, except that he isn’t too fond of liars”
	“Goddamn you” the gangster spat. Finally, he summoned the courage to look J in the eyes. “You fucking bastard”
	J looked calmly but contemptuously upon the man. Likewise, the man’s defiance was not ideal for the situation, as J knew there was only four to eleven minutes before the cops would arrive. They needed the man in a reasonable state of mind, in a reasonable span of time. 
	“A fucking bastard am I?” J questioned, his voice still soft, refusing to match the gangster’s shouting. “And why is that? Because I did away with your business partners?”
	“Motherfucker!” the gangster spat literally “You sneak in here and stab us in the back, you rat fuck!”
	“I’ll take that as a yes” J responded with a coolness that bordered on mockery. Despite his needed urgency, J did not rush. He drew steadily from his joint, finishing the remaining half in a single drag. Withdrawing it finally, J continued “But if I’m bad because I drop you guys like last week’s paper, doesn’t that mean there’s actually something good about you motherfuckers?” He suggested, smoke pouring from nearly every hole in his head. J still held his friendly tone, but his face now twisted into a snarl. 
	“Goddamn you” the gangster tried to yell, but his voice had lost its strength. 
The man could no longer hold his stare, and the moment he broke eye contact, J pounced. Lifting him to his feet, J shoved the man backwards. Now holding him against the wall, J held his pistol up to the gangster’s chin and offered a stare that was not returned.
“You fuckers work for the Amici’s” J growled “Victor Amici. If I dropped a dime in his pocket, he’d drop his own grandmother in the street. And you’re the gun in his fucking hand, aren’t you?”
With his eyes held tightly closed, the man nodded emphatically. 
“So, what the fuck is so good about you, then?” J demanded, through clenched teeth.
The man did not respond with words, but J could see his attitude had been properly shifted. Lowering his gun and untwisting his grimace, J spoke softly again “Tell Amici that he is no longer in the meth business. Not in Carter’s town at any rate. And more importantly, tell him that J-Bird and the Doctor do not take kindly to his bullshit in the slightest. You will do this, yes?”
“Yes” the man pleaded. He dared to open his eyes as J released him. He slouched down against the wall and surveyed the catastrophe before him as J walked towards the cellar doors. 
Only when J reached the stairs, did the Doctor begin to follow. The shotgun leaning against his shoulder, Doc strolled slowly towards the doors with his eyes never breaking from the surviving gangster. With a single step remaining before the stairs, Doc spat upon the floor, and finally turned his eyes forward. The two hit men took their leave. 
His back still against the wall, the gangster sat solemnly amongst his fallen comrades. This man’s name was Joseph Moretti, and as many before him, he would continue the tale of J-Bird and Dr. Swan.

Part II: Angel Wings
Anthony Amici’s House: 2:00PM, November 2
	Joseph Moretti stood with his back against a wall of Tony Amici’s dining room, facing the table at which his superiors held an urgent meeting. At the head of the table sat Victor Amici, the boss of the Amici crime family. To Victor’s immediate left, sat his consigliere, Robert Gamma, and to his right sat his reluctant cousin, Tony. 
	“Carter, that fuckin’ moolie” Victor spat. Arms crossed atop the table, he clenched his fists tightly, simmering with contempt.
	“Easy, Vic” Robert attempted. For a moment, he placed his hand on Victor’s shoulder as a comforting gesture. “Let’s not get too heated over this. That’d play right into Carter’s hands. The smart move is to wait on him”
	Victor exhaled forcibly, calming himself.
	“After all,” Robert spoke with an air of reassurance “This whole mess might just sort itself out. No way will Carter hold on now. He’ll lose his seat for sure, and without his political reach, his arms are off at the elbows” He tried not to laugh before continuing with “All thanks to this drunken samurai” but for the life of him, he could not help but smirk. 
	“But that’s just it” Victor claimed “This shit just doesn’t add up. If the Bird turned on his moolie pal, then why would he be doin’ a job for the fuckin’ guy?” 
	“Well,” running his hand over his own scalp, Robert struggled to make sense of it himself “I sure can’t see Carter ordering the hit at the hotel” (*reword this bullshit*)
	“No, shit,” Victor snapped “He might be a rat fuck politician, but he ain’t stupid”
	“Precisely” the consigliere reacted automatically, trying to keep his boss in an agreeable mood “But then it couldn’t have been Bird at the hotel at all, cause it sure as hell was him and Doc at the ice house”
	The conversation broke for a moment. In the reprieve, Victor and his consigliere offered impatient glances towards their silent host, urging him to offer something of his own. 
	As such, Tony faced down towards his table and rubbed his eyes with profound frustration before responding “Sorry Vic. But I seriously don’t need this shit” He opened his eyes, using them to shoot daggers through the wood of his dining room table, as if doing so would hasten the departure of his unwanted cousin. Tony then looked up and boldly stared down the powerful and dangerous man “I spend all yesterday dealing with cops, while they swarm the hotel like ants. Now you bring this business over to my house when Anna and Grace are here. I’m not part of this, Vic. My family is not part of this.”
	“Look, Tony” Victor offered “You are family. You gotta believe I would never bring any of this on ya. But this is some confounding shit, cousin. For all we know, these guys could be after you just as much as they’re after us”
	“Somehow, I doubt that” Tony accused. 
	“Fair enough” Victor smiled for an instant “But this shit has gotta get sorted”
	“Like I said, the guy was sweating whiskey like a motherfucker.” Tony methodically ran through the story again “He looks like he hadn’t slept in his life. He breaks right into this shtick about dogs and wolves: about how the brave ones died and the obedient ones lived. He talks all friendly, but I can’t help but think he’s gonna cut off my head”
	“He was a goombah, right?” the consigliere asked of Tony.
	“Pretty damn sure” Tony affirmed “His hands never stopped moving at any rate” This received a slight chuckle from his company “How do you guys know for sure if it was him at the other place?”
	“Oh, it was him alright” the consigliere responded automatically, nodding his head with conviction “Him and the Doctor”
	“Why?” Tony questioned, throwing his palms upward “Maybe it was just a couple posers” This received an even bigger laugh. 
	Against the wall, Moretti shifted uncomfortably, grinding his teeth. Indeed, they were not considering his presence, as it had only been a matter of hours since his brutal encounter with the hit men. 
	“Nah” Victor answered, regaining himself “Nobody else works like those two fuckers: goin’ after a whole crew with only two. Besides, there’s no way other hitters would impersonate em’. They’d be ten kinds’a dead”
	Suddenly, their attention was drawn by the sound of light and hurried footsteps. A girl of seven years stood at the doorway. 
	“Daddy,” she addressed Tony, excited and nervous “There’s somebody here” (*maybe add a longer exchange to flesh out Tony’s character*)
	“Gracie, go back upstairs” Tony shot back, his eyes widening as he dropped his frustration in favor of concern. 
	As his daughter retreated back to the upper floor, Tony ran to the front window. In front of the house were two black town cars. Emerging from the cars were eight suited men. Donning stern expressions, the men approached the front door with great purpose and haste. That is, except for the last man, who walked slowly, absorbing the surroundings. 
	“Fuck me” Tony tried not to panic as he rushed to his front door, attempting to head off the encounter. Opening the door, he found Victor’s two bodyguards exchanging with the foremost man. 
	“Oh, and here you are” the man reacted, as his attention was drawn away from the guards and towards Tony. “Frank Stephenson, FBI” The man introduced himself, producing a badge as he approached the doorway in which Tony stood.
	(Note: this takes place an hour before the very first scene)
	“What’s the meaning of this?” Tony accused of Frank.
	“We’re here for your cousin” Frank answered as a repairman would offer in (*?*) of service.
	“Well, this is my house” Tony stated with conviction in spite of his fear.
	“Come on, Tony” Frank responded through the widest of smirks “Are you telling me that these aren’t Victor Amici’s bodyguards? Is that not Robert Gamma’s rolls in the driveway? Please, Tony” The sarcasm wafted off from his words and lingered pungently in the air “What kind of G-man would I be?”
	Before Tony could think to ask for a warrant, the other men strolled past him and into his house. He turned to them, but his words could not escape. 
	“Tony,” Frank put his hand on Tony’s shoulder, and addressed him with visible mockery “Go on upstairs. Spend some time with the wife and kid” Frank then rejoined the party, as they approached the dining room. 
	For a moment, Tony stood frozen. His pulse racing, he nervously considered his position before following Frank’s suggestion and rushing upstairs toward his wife and child. (*add more introspection here. Not only flesh out his character, but bear down with the gravity of the scene*)
	At the table, Don Victor Amici and his consigliere sat pensively as four of the eight G-men continued towards the dining room. The remaining four paced around the house, sizing up the place, with the bodyguards following, sizing up the G-men. 
	Three of the foremost group entered the dining room with a promptness and deliberation. Of them, there was Frank, followed by a black gentleman, who in turn was followed by a grimacing Spaniard. Frank approached the head of the table at which Victor sat, while the other two stood rigidly along opposite walls. Already on edge, Joseph Moretti did his best to ignore the man beside him, but despite his efforts, began sweating profusely.
	Only once these positions were assumed, did the fourth one enter, a slender man of about fifty years. In a conspicuously odd manner, he strolled with a leisurely pace, as if walking through a park. Indeed, this was far from his only oddity. He was ghostly pale with white hair down to his shoulders. Reaching the head of the table, opposite from Victor, he used one hand to drag out the chair. After pulling it back several feet farther than was necessary, the man finally sat down.
	“Frank Stephenson, FBI” Frank greeted Victor, withdrawing his badge once more.
	Victor ignored Frank, enacting his right to remain silent, while staring inquisitively at the strange pale man across from him. Next to Victor, staring down at the table, his consigliere remained stoic as well.
	Leaning back, making use of the arm rests, the pale man appeared to return Victor’s gaze through his shaded, elliptic glasses. His right palm held against the arm rest, the pale man galloped his fingers in place. Slowly and methodically, his fingernails struck against the wood: tatatatap, tatatatap.
	“Don Amici,” Frank continued, addressing the mafia boss by his respectful title, but without the slightest hint of respect “Why the silent treatment? Believe it or not, it’s not your neck that we’re after. Oddly enough, it seems our interests have been aligned, my guinea friend”
	Maintaining his composure, Victor continued to ignore the G-man’s words. How the fuck did they know to come here? Victor thought. He knew his cousin would never snitch, and having spent years in the game, Victor could recognize a tail like the back of his hand. Despite this, here were the feds, all up in his face. As such, the pale man continued to stare back at Victor through those weird glasses, tapping his fingers on the arm rest: tatatatap, tatatatap.
	“We know you guys got hit pretty hard last night,” Frank went on “by the now infamous J-Bird”
	Victor grinded his teeth, and held his stare in defiance of his opponent. What was most frustrating was the lack of certainty that the pale man was honestly staring back, as his eyes were hidden behind the glasses. But somehow, Victor could sense that this was the case. Somehow, he could feel the pale man’s gaze piercing through his head as those bony fingers rapped against the wood: tatatatap, tatatatap.
	“And very much like yourself, the bureau has its own problem with Mr. Bird” Frank persisted “As I’m sure you’re aware, that fiasco at your cousin’s hotel is very much our concern as well. This isn’t fuckin’ Nicaragua, Mr. Amici. We can’t just let our let our politicians get brutalized like that”
	Victor felt his insides turn to ice as the true nature of his situation became apparent. These men were confronting him at a time in which he was least capable of militant defense. He had only three men to protect him: his consigliere and his two bodyguards. Conversely, he was faced with eight G-men. Of course, at this point, Victor suspected that most of these men were not feds at all. The pale man certainly didn’t carry himself like one. Tatatatap, tatatatap, the man might as well have been tapping on Victor’s spinal cord at this point, as the mafia boss quivered in his seat. 
	“I’m sorry,” Victor finally responded, addressing the pale man “could you stop that?”
	“Oh, pardon me” the pale man said at last, although his tone was far from genuine. His voice was barely above a whisper. “I don’t want to be a bother” he continued in the same tone, placing the guilty hand in his coat pocket. “Tell me, Mr. Moretti,” the pale man addressed of Joseph Moretti, although he kept his gaze firmly locked on Victor “Have you told Amici of your encounter with J-Bird and the Doctor?”
	By all rights, Moretti knew he should have kept his mouth shut, but there was something about the pale man that compelled him to respond “Yes I-” he began but could not continue, as corpses are unable to speak. Moretti’s body slouched down against the wall, painting a dark red streak with his skull as smoke emitted from the pale man’s pistol. 
	Following the shot, there was only silence but for the soft gurgling of Victor’s bodyguards as they were choked in other rooms. 
	Astonished, Victor gawked at his opponent. Even though the pale man had shot from the hip, he had landed a shot on Moretti’s forehead without even turning to face his target. It was an ungodly display of gunmanship. 
	Fuck me, Victor thought. “You’re Krunch” Victor tried to shout, but could only manage a whimper.
	“Indeed” Krunch confessed, holstering his weapon “I hope I wasn’t bothering you, Mr. Amici” Krunch spoke with a volume that could barely be registered “I know what it’s like to be annoyed beyond the point of toleration: it’s like having bugs crawl up your back. If they walked with heavy steps, you could pinpoint them and squash them right away”
	Victor’s pulse quickened with apprehension. His consigliere now faced Krunch with an equally nervous expression.
	“But they tread softly” Krunch went on, with light reflecting brilliantly from his glasses. “You can’t be sure if they’re even there at all. But, they are there: ready to poison you” There was a pause that seemed to fill an eternity “You see, Mr. Amici, you and I are plagued by the same infestation”
	“Krunch, please” Victor Amici begged of his psychotic opponent.  
	“Victor,” Krunch answered, maintaining his nearly inaudible volume. He leaned back even farther in his seat. “We have the same problem, and now is the perfect time to address it. It seems Mr. Herman Carter and his dogs have made a habit of slowing your business, just as they have ruined mine”
	“I’m sorry,” Victor urged of Krunch, holding his hands up in surrender “But J and Doc can’t be hit. Those ja’mokes are just too unpredictable, and they swing back harder than a wreckin’ ball” 
	“Mr. Amici,” Krunch deliberated every syllable “There is nothing that I can’t hit, as long as I know where my target is” Again, Krunch reached into his tuxedo jacket, this time to retrieve a cigarette. Lighting it, he maintained his vicious lock on Victor throughout the entire maneuver “And now I do. I have found a way to place all three of my rotten eggs in one basket: Carter, Bird, and the Doctor. With your help, I can drop them all at once”
	“My help?” Victor dared to ask as sweat rained down his face.
	“Indeed” smoke eased out along with Krunch’s words “I will enlist your men for my service. There is no question that they will serve my faithfully. Of course, keeping you two alive should ease their transition” 
	Victor and his consigliere laughed loudly and awkwardly in their relief. They shared nervous glances towards each other.
	“So, it’s settled then?” Krunch asked of Victor.
	“Oh, yes” Victor agreed emphatically “Anything for Captain Krunch” 
	Just then, finally standing up, Krunch removed his glasses and stared, wide eyed through Victor’s head, before spouting “You would do well not to call me that”
	Victor and his consigliere nodded desperately as the men took their leave.	As Krunch approached the front door on his way out, the Spaniard intercepted him.
	“Tony’s in the car, sir” the Spaniard informed him.
	“And what of his girls?” Krunch asked without emphasis.
	“Taken care of” the Spaniard responded. (*add some sort of haunting image like the girl’s toy or something*)

An underground brothel in West Milwaukee: 3:00 AM, November 2nd (Several hours before that last scene and an hour after the meth lab scene)

	His elbows held forcibly upward, his shoulders nearly touched one another as the customer was dragged towards the center of the room by two large men.
	“Come on guys,” the patron pleaded with the two bruisers as he struggled futilely against them “You got me all wrong”
	“Is that so?” one of the two responded disingenuously, while pushing the customer down to his knees.
	Through swollen eyes, an escort nervously watched the three men. Arms crossed, she lowered her gaze as the bruisers pushed the customer’s head down.
	“You just wait til’ Ms. Chievous gets here” (*God dammit. I need a better name than this*) the left bruiser threatened the kneeling man “She doesn’t take too kindly to guys who play rough with her girls”
	“Please” the man begged, with his face pointing towards the floor “This isn’t me, guys. I didn’t do shit”
	“Do ya know what happened to the last guy who beat on a broad in this place?” The right bruiser asked rhetorically “Let’s say that when he left here, he was a couple eggs short of an omelet”
	The left bruiser shook his head with embarrassment for the shitty analogy. 
	“Oh Jesus” the patron despaired. The bruisers maintaining their hold of him, the customer’s drunken delirium gave way to his sobering reality. He tried to slow his breathing as panic seized hold of him as well. 
	Uneasy with this display, the escort turned and headed towards the exit. Following her cue, a few patrons stood up from the bar and took their leave as well (*Add more description. What goddamn bar? I’m not feeling this place*). There was only one who remained, keeping his back to the confrontation and lazily swirling the ice about his empty drink. The hushed gossip of the leaving men was accompanied by the chiming of the lone man’s glass.
	The tavern-esque doors swung outward, as the customers embarked (*embarked? No*) toward the stairwell. As the doors swung inward, a woman glided through them. For a moment, she stood abreast of the door and stared as if perplexed by the scene in front of her. 
	“Oh my” she announced “Here I was thinking you boys closed up without me. But it looks like we gotta troublemaker” She spoke with a high pitch and an almost obscene friendliness. 
	“Sorry boss,” the right bruiser began “Didn’t mean to scare off the clientele, but this one here was beatin’ on Daisy” he gave the man a quick and violent shake, as if there was any question about to whom he was referring. “And you always say to make examples out of the (*nickname they have for dudes who hit their prostitutes*)”
	“Oh, no. Now why would you go and do that?” she reacted playfully but without mockery, as if addressing a child. She headed towards the offender.
	“Please, Ms. Cheivous” the offender hurriedly begged.
	“Call me Chi, sweetheart” She placed a hand on his shoulder. For a moment, she looked up towards her two employees. “Come on boys, let him up a bit”
	The bruisers eased up, allowing the offender to stand more erectly.
	“Now why don’t you tell me what happened?” she spoke with genuine concern and without the slightest of accusation. ‘
	“Ms. Chi, please” the offender struggled to calm himself as he pleaded his case “This isn’t me, I swear”
	The left bruiser grunted in protest before interjecting “Daisy’s face sure begs to differ”
	“Hush now, babe” she addressed the bruiser without taking her eyes off the offender, or altering her timid expression. “Is that right? Have you ever heard of punching bags? They’re a bunch cheaper than a whore and you don’t have to put up with all this trouble”
	The offender did not respond with words, but his attitude had been properly adjusted. Slowing his breath, he was able to look Chi in the eyes. 
	“Don’t let these big fellas scare ya” she waved her hand dismissively “I’m sure they got ya all riled up. But these dogs are all bark. Just tell me what happened. What really happened. And we’ll take it easy on ya”
	After taking a deep breathe, the offender explained “Daisy took me to the back. I was pretty liquored up. I can’t really remember what I said. But, I remember her trying to kick me out. She said I broke the rules and I ain’t gettin’ a refund. Things got pretty heated then and” he gulped “I think I hit her a couple times. God, I didn’t mean to. It was the booze. I would never do this. You gotta believe me”
	She patted his shoulder “See, that wasn’t so hard. Was it?”
	Between very nervous laughter he confessed with immense relief “Christ, I thought you’d take my balls or something”
	“Your balls?!” she dismissed the notion as if preposterous “Don’t be silly. Just one ball oughtta do” 
	As the bruisers dragged him backward, the offender shat proverbial bricks at the realization that Chi wasn’t joking. He cried out and struggled with all his might but to no avail. Being dragged into one of the private rooms, the offender’s shouting was muffled as the door closed behind him.	
	Turning towards the bar, Ms. Chi caught sight of the one remaining patron, who presented his back. “Well,” she greeted him with enthusiasm “Looks like we’ve got a doctor in the house”
	Still facing away from her, Dr. Swan shook his head with embarrassment for the shitty joke. “You’re too much, Chi” he answered over his shoulder.
	“I know” she confessed, heading around towards the back of the bar “But, I gotta be tough on em’. I can’t exactly call the cops, now can I?”
	Doc grunted in agreement, as Chi approached his position from the behind the bar. “Why don’t you just off the guy?” he asked rhetorically. “His breathing is only a liability at this point. But, I guess you’ve always had a taste for the theatrics. Haven’ you, Ms. Chievous?” he continued insincerely, poking fun rather than lecturing. 
	“Hey, we can’t all be like Saint Bastard, now can we?” she jested in return, addressing Doc by his most awesome title. “Sorry for the lack of service, child. My boys have their, uh, hands full at the moment” she apologized while refilling his glass. “Which reminds me; it looks like J’s gotten himself into some crazy stuff. My birds are singin’ pretty loud about that mess”
	“Well, Chi, that’s actually what brought me here” Doc confessed. He stared solemnly at his drink, while the ice cubes performed their insentient tango “J says the hotel was a frame-job and I’d like for you to look into it”
	“Well, my word” she proclaimed “That’s a hell of an odd way to go about a setup. How’d that go down anyhow?” 
	“I can’t say. J doesn’t remember shit” Doc informed her. The ice circled slower and slower around the edge of his glass. Looking up from the drink, Doc studied her reaction.
	“That’s leaving me pretty well in the dark, hun. I can keep my ears on it, but the thing is…” there was the slightest of changes in her expression. A ripple of apprehension spread across her face. “Are you sure it wasn’t J?” Chi asked. It was virtually unnoticeable, but the Doctor could see, plain as day, that she was uncertain of herself. “I mean, it’s pretty crazy, but when you think about J…” She was very much unsure of how Doc would react to this implication. 
	“You know,” Doc began, looking back down at his drink “There was a time when I’d laugh at a question like that. I’d think: there’s no way that a master of the craft could make such a ridiculous mistake. There’s no earthly reason for it. Now though…” The ice cubes were almost immobile at this point, but for their slowly bleeding into the liquor “With the way he’s been on our last couple jobs, I doubt there’s a dry hour in his day; and the way J talks now? For fuck’s sake, the dude’s like Dr. Seuss with rabies” Doc paused again. Although the drink was the focus of his eyes, it was far from the focus of his mind. The cubes were now as flimsy reminders of their former beings, floating haplessly about the cold fluid. “I must say that it’s crossed my mind” Doc knew it was not the ice that cooled the drink, but the drink that warmed the ice. Acting with the purest of passivity, the ice performed its task slowly but with absolute certainty. “But there’s something about this whole scenario that strikes me as odd, aside from the general batshittery of it. It’s outrageous, but it also has a sort of precision. It seems the exact way to convince us that he’s snapped, and Carter’s liable to mount J’s head for tanking his career. It’s almost perfect.”
	“What kind of suicidal bastard would wanna mess with both Carter and J-Bird?” Chi protested “And if they already made J at the hotel, why wouldn’t they just kill him”
	“Because, they’re after me too. J and yourself are the only ones who know how to reach me, after all” Doc explained casually, as if his being hunted was hardly worth noting. “Unfortunately, if they have an eye on J, they might be on me already. The fucking guy’s out by the car right now, polishing off some Cuervo no less”
	“Goddamn,” Chi remarked with genuine concern “Still, it’s hard to picture anyone balls enough to go after you guys at once, especially after the Vasquez job”
	“Indeed, it does strain the mind” Doc went on, his mind not at all strained “At any rate; keep an ear for any songs about the Amici’s or the Santiago’s. I figure those fuckers would have both the means and the proper urge to dump the three of us in a shallow grave” Doc then adjusted slightly. Sliding his drink away, Doc lost a touch of his nonchalance upon the conclusion “Or maybe Krunch is back”

Some goddamn park in Milwaukee, along the lake: 1:30PM, November 2nd 
	She was airborne, ascending from the very peak of the mountaintop. Her arms were held straight out to both sides, welcoming the heavenly embrace of the sky. Just above her arms, her massive, angelic wings stretched outward, propelling her away from the mountain and beyond the reach of the flames below. The pencil tip strode along the uppermost flame: the finality of the drawing.
	J-Bird leaned back against the park bench, placing the drawing pad on his lap. Now satisfied with the drawing, he reached to his left and withdrew a cheeseburger from his take-out bag. Just as he began to unwrap it, a visitor approached him. It was a German shepherd. 
	Roughly two yards from J-Bird, the dog sat down and stared eagerly towards him. J bit down into the burger with his eyes locked on the dog, knowing full well of its intentions. The dog tilted its head adorably, appearing as non-threatening as possible. J was not immune to this display. Trying to ignore the dog, he shifted his eyes down to the drawing. 
	The eraser prodded towards her from an unknowable direction. She could only gaze upward while her creator tidied her appearance, smoothing out her lines.
	Chewing on his second bite, J looked towards the dog. It sat before him in the same position and stared at his lunch with the same intention. J rolled his eyes, annoyed with the dog’s persistence. But as the moments passed, his annoyance shifted to guilt. It didn’t have a collar, so for all J knew, it might not have eaten in days. Giving in to the pooch’s demands, J ripped off a piece of his burger and surrendered it. The dog ate quickly and emphatically. Finishing the piece, it reassumed the begging position and continued staring.
	“Ah, fuck you” J told the dog, knowing that it wouldn’t leave him alone now. 
	“And good afternoon to you too” Sargent Tom Brannock greeted J-Bird, approaching from his left. Tom took a seat on the bench, to the left of J, and leaned back casually. J did not acknowledge his presence. 
	The cop and the hit man sat on opposing sides of the park bench, beholding the scene in front of them. A small boy ran with a kite. Two teenagers played with a Frisbee. It was a pleasant scene. 
	The two men gazed upon their surroundings in a very similar way. But, there was a subtle difference. Having just arrived, Tom stared cautiously from side to side, absorbing his surroundings. But J-Bird’s eyes did not move, his vision unfocused. He looked upon the scene but he did not see it. He could only see the flames, the flames that loomed in the corner of his mind. 
	“That’s where you did it, right?” Tom asked of J. “They stuck that fucking statue right over the spot, didn’t they?” About 50 yards before them stood a monument. It depicted a suited black gentlemen kneeling in front of a weeping child. The stone man held his hand on the boy’s shoulder in a fatherly gesture. Beneath their stone feet, the monument proclaimed that ‘Through the fires of hate shall we grow strong and triumph’. The stone gentlemen appeared very much like Congressman Herman Carter. 
	“Motherfuckers” J remarked while throwing the last bit of the burger to the hungry dog. 
	“You got that right,” Tom forced a laugh “Fucking politics”. Tom’s face held his calm expression with visible effort while his hand held the armrest in furious protest. His knuckles turned white as he squeezed the wood. With his other hand, he took out a manila folder from his jacket and slid it along the bench.
	“Oh,” J reacted with a playful tone. He still refused to face Tom. “Are we done with the foreplay already?” Without turning his head, J retrieved the folder and slid it under his drawing pad.
	“The feds got your description yesterday. I don’t think it does you justice. You’re much uglier in person.” Tom explained “There’s a copy in there, and whatever else I could get my hands on. Jesus, what a mess we have” Tom shook his head contemptuously “I thought you were a fucking professional. I had you pegged as some kind of dago James Bond”
	“Is it fair to treat a monster like a monster?” J retorted, having none of the insult.
	 “Uh,” Tom answered confusedly, taken off guard by the strange question. “what?”
	“If just now,” J went on “this dog was to run across this park and maul a child. Then, we’d have to shoot it. I mean, we can’t have a monster running around, hurting children. But if instead of shooting him, if we were to pin it down and bite its neck, would that be fair?”
	“Well,” Tom tried to converse, still unsure of what J was getting at “It does have that whole ‘eye for an eye’ thing going for it” 
	“I’m not so sure” J kept going “I mean, a monster can’t help but do monstrous things. But we can. We can see the monstrosity. So, isn’t it worse on our part?” J finally turned his head and faced Tom. “Do you still think we should’ve done them like that?”
	“Are you shitting me?” Tom asked, now understanding “Christ, I would bring those two cocksuckers back just to do it again” Tom’s eye’s shot daggers at the base of the statue “Maybe it’s easier for you. But you don’t have to live with it: what Amici’s goons did to her. Every night, I have to see her. Do you understand that? Every night I see the scars, the fucking cigarette burns. Every noise in the house, every bump, she almost jumps out of her skin” He turned back to J and pointed a finger accusingly at the statue “I only wish I could do it myself. I wish I could’ve stood right there and watched those bastards go”
	“I’m sure you would have, Tom” For a moment there was silence. He could not return Tom’s malice. J was a man of passion but not of hate. J faced away from Tom and towards the drawing on his lap. The flames raged all along the mountaintop. They devoured all creatures. But the angel rose above them. J had to save her from the fire.  “And I would’ve traded my front row tickets for your nice little vendetta in a heartbeat. Then you could’ve stood there and watched like I did, until their fat dripped like candle wax. You would’ve brought fucking marshmallows, I bet.”  
	“Oh, like you’re someone to lecture me?” Tom was on the verge of attack. 
	“The only difference between you and me is I don’t hide behind a badge” J said flatly.
	As Tom inhaled for his retort, a slight smile appeared across his face. The words struck him oddly. Now laughing, he could not bring himself to fire back. “Son of a bitch,” Tom said jokingly “With the way shit’s looking now, I’m not so sure you’re wrong.”
	“Who gave up the description? Rachael or Tony?” J asked with nonchalance, his eyes still on the drawing.
	“Funny thing about that: Fed’s say it’s an informant”
	“Is that right?” J asked rhetorically, shaking his head.
	“Yea I know. This case fucking reeks. Sometimes I wonder what the fuck I’m doing on this side at all.”
	“Come on, Tom. You’re here chatting with me aren’t you? You know there aren’t any sides. There’re only men trying to keep their shit.” J removed a flask from his jacket and drank liberally. He then looked towards the dog “Everyone needs their piece of the burger”
	“Drunken philosophy” Tom reacted, looking upward and laughing “You know, the second my partner told me about your little exchange with the Tony, I knew right away it was you, man. I mean, a thug walking around this town spouting heavy shit like that? Why, who else but my good pal, J-Bird.” Tom was speaking in a friendly manner, but the two men were far from friends. One was liable to cut the others throat if need be. “Maybe you should consider another line of work. Your shit is getting awfully conspicuous”
	“Well, I don’t want to make it too hard on you guys. There’s no fun in that.” J lowered his tone of sarcasm before continuing with “Besides, a guy can’t exactly go from taking lives to selling used fucking cars. Although, I’m sure that can’t be news for you, Sergeant”
	Tom did not respond with words, but it was clear that the two men were in agreement on this point. Tom stood up casually, and took a couple steps towards J. “Sir, you can’t drink in public. I’m afraid I have to confiscate that” He took J’s flask from his hand. Standing no more than a foot in front of J, facing him boldly, he turned his head up and gulped down the remaining whiskey. 
	“Son of a bitch” J shook his head. “I’m putting that on your bill, you bastard. And the way things are looking, I think I’ll be cashing out real soon”
	Tom tossed the empty flask back at J. It landed on the drawing pad and spun once before stopping on the corner. Squinting, Tom took notice of the drawing: the mountaintop, the inferno, the naked angel rising above it. 
	“That’s pretty fucked up, man” Tom remarked while turning away. He started to walk off.
	“Oh, come on. This shit is pretty tasteful for my standards” J defended.
	“That’s not what I meant”
	J would never admit it. Perhaps, he wasn’t even aware. But, his angels always resembled the women with which he philandered. As surely as J looked down upon the drawing, Rachael White’s likeness looked up toward the graphite heavens.
	Tom whistled and the dog stood up promptly. It rushed to his right side and walked alongside him.
	“Ah” J cursed “double fuck you”



Milwaukee Police Department: 8:00 PM, November 2nd
	Special Agent Katrina Carter reentered the interrogation room. Moving quickly, but without haste, she approached the table. From the other side, Rachael looked pleadingly toward her, hoping for good news. But, Katrina did not acknowledge this.  
	Sitting down, Katrina failed to meet Rachael’s gaze. She merely pulled out her notepad and began to flip through it. However, she did so without the calm and collected expression that she had shown earlier that day. Indeed, Katrina looked bothered as she methodically thumbed through the pages. There was something that seemed to trouble her. She paused, staring at the pad without reading it. Her inner turmoil grew more and more visible.
	“You know,” Katrina began, flipping the pad closed and finally looking toward Rachael “I have to say that this is the most royally messed up case I’ve ever had”
	“You don’t say” Rachael reacted dryly.
	Katrina offered a nod while preparing to speak her mind “You might recall, earlier today, my partner warned you about the dangerous people you’ve wound up dealing with”
	Rachael answered only with her unchanging, forlorn expression. 
	“Well honestly, there’s no saying for sure. But, what I do know is: there really are some bad people out there. Now, when I say that, I don’t mean like some cartoon-ass devil with horns. I mean real fuckin’ life bad.”
	Rachael was taken aback by Katrina’s casual tone.
	“You see, real life bad guys are worse. They’re worse because they do shit for what they think are good reasons. And the absolute, most bullshit of these ‘good reasons’ is payback. Revenge. These thugs will do all kinds of fucked up shit if they think the other guys did something to deserve it. I mean, one dude smacks another dude, so the other dude kicks the first dude, and the shit goes on until one of them is mutilating some random fool just to setup the other guy”
	“Is that supposed to make me feel better?” Rachael interjected, her voice gaining strength for the sake of opposition. “Because this has nothing to do with me personally, I’m supposed to shrug it off or something?”  
	“No” Katrina answered with blatant sincerity “You’re supposed to listen. Because your innocence won’t save you. Not here. Not anymore.”
	Rachael pursed her lips in an effort to reconcile for her misstep.
	“I really wouldn’t be saying this if I didn’t think it mattered.” Katrina paused, finally convincing herself to go ahead “A few years ago in this town, there was this cop, an honest, cat saving, old lady walking, dyed in the wool po-lice man, who had a run in with a bad crowd. See, these mob assholes wanted him to look the other way while they shoveled dirt. The cop didn’t oblige. So, the grease-balls send a few crooked blues to bust him up. But, the cop didn’t oblige that shit either. In fact, he ends up beating their asses so bad that one of them dies in the ER. Now, the mob can’t afford to look weak like that. In their game, as soon as you look weak, you are weak. So those despicable fucks sent a couple goons over to the cop’s house when only his wife was there.” Katrina had to collect herself for a moment “To this day, nothing has been proven, but everyone ‘in the know’ knows that the Ice Barbeque was payback for what they did to his woman”
	Rachael recoiled. What little of her confidence had been recovered, was now lost. 
	“Point is: this was a man who was so righteous he wouldn’t take a heap of fuckin’ cash to keep his mouth shut. To literally do nothing. Yet, he had two men burned alive out of revenge.”
	It was all Rachael could do to keep herself together. She squeezed her edge of the table in protest.
	“I say this not to fuck with you. Not to make you afraid. I mean to help you. From now on, you’ll have to be careful of everyone. Not just bad guys. Not just trifling niggas. Everyone. Even those who are supposed to protect you.” With that, Katrina pocketed her notes and stood up to leave.
	As the agent left the room, Rachael lifted her hand and mouthed words that would never come to be.
	The door closed and Katrina exhaled forcibly, trying to calm herself in light of the grim reality. Out there, somewhere, a powerful man will benefit from Rachael’s silence. For that reason, Rachael’s murder was assured.
	Katrina walked hurriedly down the hall, bitter and despaired. Trying to keep her mind occupied, she focused on distant matters, but only to be dragged right back down into reality as Frank called out to her from a nearby… office?
	“Kat, that’s some timing. I got Daddy Dearest on the line here for you” he informed her with a tone so thick and saccharine, you could pour it over waffles. 
What a fucked up world this is, Katrina thought to herself as she reluctantly walked in. A person could just about spend their entire life trying to do good, but with one fucking phone call, some rich, heartless motherfucker can undo everything. She picked up the phone. 
	 “I’m not gonna lie. I kind of want to choke you right now” Katrina told her father, congressmen Herman Carter, sounding entirely defeated. She squeezed the phone maliciously. “Yea, I know this shit is just politics. Isn’t everything politics in your line of work?” She then paused while Herman automatically explained himself. “MmmHmm, I got word from Frank. We release her tomorrow morning.”

Herman Carter’s House: 8:10PM, November 2nd
	“Oh, don’t sound so bent up about it, sweetheart. You know this shit happens. Some string pulling mofo calls the mayor and says he doesn’t want his kid in police custody. I’m just giving you guys the heads up, baby.” Herman listened very intently as Katrina spoke her mind about the matter, knowing these were the last words he would ever hear from his daughter. “Alright, goodbye. Love you, Kat” The muzzle of the hit man’s pistol pressed into Herman’s chin as he leaned over to hang up the phone.
	“Good job, Carter” The Spaniard, known most commonly as El Sabueso, congratulated Herman “As I am a man of my word, I will let you say your peace” 
	“Fuck you,” Herman spat, trying to go out as boldly as possible “You chump ass nigga” 
	The hit man looked confused by the statement “I’m sorry, my English is, perhaps, not good enough. What is this ‘chump’ you mean?”
	“Oh come on, Sabby”, standing idly behind the Spaniard, the black hit man informed his partner “It mean you a bitch”
	El Sabueso was not pleased with this revelation. “Una Puta?! These will not be your last words! Make another or you will suffer before I shoot you”
	The mounted polar bear head stared with its perpetual contempt at the three men. The fire raged gloriously underneath it, illuminating Herman’s bodyguard, whose head stained the expensive carpet. 
	“Come on,” the black hit man, most commonly known as Fly, urged of his partner “Do this fool before the cops show up”
	“No, man” Sabueso responded “There is always honor” He turned back to Herman. “Say your fucking peace, man”
	“What the fuck would that mean?” Herman inquired. “To rat fuckers like you guys?”
	Sabueso grinned in spite of the heated exchange, relishing the spirit of battle. “How in the hell do you sit here, in your castle built on lies, and call us ratas?” He turned and looked casually over toward the murdered bodyguard. “The only one who stayed, no?” turning back, speaking softly but with intense purpose “All of your men. They did not even hesitate to betray you in your time of weakness: the lowly, disloyal, followers of a lowly, disloyal man. Even your only daughter. She could hardly spare you a kind word.”
	“Alright,” Herman relented, having enough of the berating “I’ve got my last words. Well, I guess it’s a question, really” Herman looked down and squinted ponderously for a moment. In these last instants, he looked calm and unafraid as he contemplated. Finally, he looked up and faced his killer “Have you seen deez?” 
	“Uh,” Sabueso reacted, confused “what?”
	“DEEZ NUUUUUU-”
	Herman Carter’s glorious death cry was silenced by a gunshot from over Sabueso’s shoulder. 
	“mothafucka…” Fly mumbled to himself as he holstered his pistol and straightened his tuxedo jacket. 




A small white room, in an unknown location: 4:40AM, November 3rd
	How long had he been here? They had taken him from his house in the afternoon and kept him captive in this room for several hours. He knew it must have been late at night. Or was it morning already? There was no way to tell time in the empty and windowless room. Tired and under severe duress, his senses may have been unreliable. Although, there really wasn’t much use of his senses anyway. All he had to see was the unvarying span of white paint covering the walls of the room and the table at which he was seated. All he had to hear was the low hum of the single light bulb on the ceiling. All he had to feel was the pressure from his own hands as the duct tape held them together. He could only think. 
Minute upon minute. Hour after hour. Tony Amici desperately tried to repeat his cycle of purposefully distracting thoughts. Most often, he concerned himself with the passage of time. For a very considerable period, he had actually tried to keep track by counting seconds. But by now, he had abandoned the effort. Escape. He needed an escape, if not of his body, than at least of his mind. An ocean. Not a soulless unmoving expanse of white, but a beautiful blue sea, teaming with life. Sand. Not the merciless, cold grip of duct tape, but the warm, soft cushion of sand. Laughter. 
No. No, it couldn’t be the beach. He must think of something else. Grass. A sea not of white, nor blue, but green. The feel of the dimpled golf ball as he placed it on the tee. 
Maybe they’re alright. 
The relief as he stepped out of the sun and into the cart. 
Maybe they’re alive. 
The cool sensation on his hand as he grabbed the beer from the cup holder. 
He didn’t know for sure. 
The weight of the nine-iron on the back swing. 
But, he did know. These were not men that made mistakes like that. 
The pride of scoring under par.
Gracie’s laughter. 
Blood trickled from Tony’s mouth as he bit viciously into his cheek. 
Suddenly, breaking his trance, the door handle turned. Tony flinched and stared maniacally at the door as it was slowly opened. He could see a pale, bony hand grasping the outside handle as his captor entered the room. The man remained completely silent, except for his gently closing the door behind him. He then strolled leisurely over to the table before slowly and methodically pulling out the chair opposite from Tony. There was a piercing screech as the legs scraped against the floor. Finally sitting down, the man reclined slightly with his right hand atop the table. Casually, Krunch galloped his fingers in place. Tatatatap, tatatatap.
Eyes wide, Tony’s face contorted in many directions, struggling to cope with the whirlwind of conflicting emotions. Misery, anger, and unimaginable terror swirled around one another, fighting for control of Tony’s expression. 
Krunch remained silent. Through his elliptic glasses, he stared at Tony as one would read a news bulletin, calm and purposeful. Tatatatap, tatatatap.
Tony could not bear to look at his captor. He felt ill at the thought of Krunch sitting there looking outright bored. So, Tony held his head down and ground his teeth, if only to distract from Krunch’s incessant tapping.
Tatatatap, tatatatap. 
“Why am I here?” Tony gave in.
“Because three years ago, your family made a mistake that has yet to be taken care of” Krunch answered plainly.
“The Ice Barbeque?” Tony exclaimed “How the fuck is it my fault that Victor went after a cop’s wife?”
“I didn’t say it was. And that wasn’t Victor’s mistake. His mistake was throwing rocks at a tiger and assuming he was safe over the wall. Well, turns out the tiger could jump the wall and now everyone is paying the price for it, when Victor should have just shot the fucking thing or left it alone to begin with. Now I’m afraid you’re getting trampled in the ensuing panic.” Tatatatap, tatatatap.
“Just do it already” Tony pleaded “Just kill me. That’s where this is going, isn’t it?”
“Why would we do that?” Krunch responded with half-hearted incredulity. “If we just wanted to kill you, we could have done the job back at your house” Tatatatap, tatatatap.
“I don’t know anything.” Tony pleaded. “I’m not even in the game. I never have been. There’s no point in torturing me like this.”
“There isn’t?” Krunch asked rhetorically. “If you’re clean, than how are you such an expert on torture?” Tatatatap, tatatatap.
“Fuck you,” Tony resolved to face Krunch “Do what you want, you piece of shit. It doesn’t matter anymore. You took everything from me already.”
Krunch finally stopped his tapping. With one slow, unwavering motion, he removed his glasses and placed them inside his tuxedo jacket. He leaned then forward, folding his arms and placing his elbows on the table. 
“You know,” Krunch began “What a lot of people in my position would do is apologize. They’d say something like ‘it’s nothing personal’ or some other foolishness. As if that would be some kind of fucking comfort for you” He looked down for a moment “Mr. Amici, you have every right to skin me alive for what I’ve done, but I’m afraid you’re on the wrong side of this table. It’s that simple.” 
Tony spat at Krunch.
Unflinching, Krunch removed his soiled jacket and tossed it on the floor. 
“If it’s any consolation, I’ve been on that side of the table. My home, my family. All taken from me in the wake of this giant clusterfuck. But, I’ve managed to learn something from it: the great and terrible truth that none of us matter. We really don’t. You, me, we all go. So, we can’t just live for the sake of life itself. But our principles. Our way of living. We can make something truly meaningful from that. Something lasting. This whole mess that we’ve been tangled up in, it’s far greater than you or I, and it’s outcome will effect more people than we can even imagine.” Krunch stood up and opened the door. He stood there idly for a moment. 
“Goddammit, you can’t just keep me here like this!” Tony cried. 
“I’m not,” Krunch replied softly as two suited men came through the door. They walked over to Tony stood on either side of him. The one on Tony’s left pulled out a length of piano wire. 
“Fucking Christ” Tony writhed in his seat “I told you I don’t know anything!”
“I know” Krunch answered as the men stepped against the chair to gain leverage. 
Tony mouthed words that would never come to be as the wire wrapped around his face. 

The parking lot in front of the Korean nail salon above the underground brothel: 1:00 PM, November 3rd
	Ms. Chievous stepped out of her car and towards the salon. Having found out some vital information about J-Bird’s frame job, she was in a rush to take care of the legitimate side of her business before meeting up with J and Doc. As such, she walked hastily to the door, ignoring the peculiar suited man leaning against the adjacent store window (it’s like a complex with a bunch of stores). Going through the door, she grew perplexed at the very odd site: there was no one there. Walking in a few paces, she looked back to the front glass. Indeed there was no sign indicating her employees were on break. She scanned the room pensively. Inhaling deeply, her face tautened with concern. Something was definitely wrong. Slowly, she walked over towards the counter and looked over to find what she had feared. Stacked over each other, the bodies of her four employees lied face down on the floor. 
	“Good afternoon, Ms. Chievous” A large, suited man greeted her sarcastically, walking out from the supply room. 
	The front door swung open again as the other suited man walked in. 
	“Our boss wants a word with you” the first man said “Come on. This doesn’t have to be difficult”
	“It won’t be” Chi responded dryly. 
(start comic portion, motherfucker)
*Chi grabs a coffee mug off the counter and chucks it at thug2.
*The mug breaks on thug2’s forehead. His expression is like “Ah, you bitch!”
*Thug1 goes to grab her.
*Without turning to face him, she mule kicks thug1 in the nuts
*Thug1 doubles over, temporarily incapacitated
*Chi jumps up on the counter while thug2, now with a furious expression, goes toward her
*He reaches up to grab her. 
*(Taking advantage of her position, and his fully extended arm) Chi grabs his arm and-
*lies down on the counter while putting thug2 in an arm bar. 
*She breaks his arm while thug1 (having collected himself) heads toward her.
*Letting go of the bar, she kicks thug1 in the temple (when she does the arm bar, she’s lying on her side facing the back of the store, which is toward thug1. So it’s like a front kick except she hits with the top of her foot)
*She flips behind the counter (back flip from her lying position, so she rolls backward and lands on her feet)
*Thug2 hangs his broken arm by his side
*Chi spin kicks over the counter, knocking thug2 out cold (Note: A spin kick is by far the most ballsy kick. It’s supposed to land when you can hardly see the motherfucker. So, if you somehow get hit in the head with one, you totally deserve to get knocked out by it)
*As thug1 is regaining himself (he landed on the ground after the kick. Now he’s rising to his knees, disoriented) Chi cartwheels back-
*to the other side of the counter and-
*stomps thug1 in the head (who is now on his hands and knees), knocking him out.
*Chi books it out of the store

Titty bar somewhere in West Milwaukee (AKA: the hood): 2:00PM November 3rd
	“Shitballs,” J remarked under his breath, as the stripper hung her ass over the stage at him. 
	“Keep it cool, J” Doc urged of his partner. 
	“Nah, man,” J responded. His face was calm, save for the march of a thousand screaming chimps behind his eyes. “They think they can get away with this shit. Whoever they are.”
	The stripper stood up and headed over to the other side of the stage, cheered on by the more enthusiastic customers. 
	“He’s gone, man. You heard the news. There’s nothing we can do about it. Best to keep our heads until we know which way is up” Doc calmly implored while looking straight ahead. “I know he was your friend but-”
	“My friend?” J interjected, also facing ahead. He spoke quietly but with an unmistakable ferocity “Herman Carter was nobody’s fucking friend. He was a two timing rat bastard who happened to pay well. But he was on my side. Which means this town, and any other place he laid a fucking foot in, was goddamn his. And somebody had the balls to shit all over that”
	Doc did not respond. Unmoving, he faced straight ahead with his eyes turned away from J. 
	“Yea, don’t say anything. Always the professional you are.” J shook his head with slight contempt “Not giving a fuck about fuck”
	Doc turned towards J with purpose in his eyes. When J looked over to him, Doc nodded his head towards the bar. 
	Shifting his eyes as subtly as possible, J saw what Doc saw. There were two men, in sweat suits, facing each other and periodically turning towards them. 
	J and Doc faced each other. With a nod from J, the plan was wordlessly set into motion.
	Doc stood up and walked over to the bar. He sat down three seats to the left of the two men. They did not look over to Doc. Not even once. So, at this time J and Doc knew that they had only recognized J, probably from the police sketches that were shown on the news. 
	A minute passed and one of the two men stood up. J and Doc saw that his mannerisms were of authority. So he was probably the highest ranking gang member in the bar. As he was sharing his parting words with the other man at bar, J stood up and walked over to him. 	
	The moment the gang leader turned and saw J-Bird standing right before him, he knew he had fucked up. The expression on the man’s face told J all that he needed to know.

Each asterisk (*) indicates one panel of the comic. If what I write seems like too much for only one panel, feel free to break it up into more. The same goes for the opposite of you think it best to combine panels into one. 
*J grabs the gang leader by the collar
*J headbutts him
*J tosses him (like a judo throw)
*The leader lands onto the bar counter, back first, with his head towards J and his arm held in a “kimura” type hold. 
*J breaks the arm
*Alarmed, the rest of the gang gets up (some from the tables, some from the stage) and heads toward J
*Revealing himself, Doc intercepts the nearest thug
*With one hand on thug1’s collar, Doc punches him
*Thug1 falls to his knees
*Thug2 rushes at Doc (coming from the tables)
*Not even looking towards him, Doc sidekicks thug2 in the chest (in yo mothafuckin’ chest!)
*Thug2 flies dramatically backward and through a table
*Doc turns back to thug1, who is disoriented and still on his knees, and knocks him out with a knee
*Thug3 takes a horizontal swing at J with a broken beer bottle, which J dodges by leaning backward
*Thug3 lunges with the beer bottle, J dodges by turning to his side. 
*J catches the attacking arm
*J breaks his arm with a standing arm bar (think Batman)
*Disarming him, J stabs thug3 in the neck with the broken bottle (not so much like Batman)
*Thug4 rushes at J
*J drops thug4 with a roundhouse kick to the head
*Cautiously, Thug5 (he’s actually the club bouncer) approaches J in a proper fighting stance
*Thug5 takes a jab at J, which J dodges by sidestepping
*Thug5 throws a round kick at J’s torso, which J catches with one arm
*With his free arm, J knocks down thug5 with a jab of his own
*Using thug5’s leg as a lever, J flips him over onto his stomach
*J breaks thug5’s ankle with an appropriately named ankle bar just as thugs 6 and 7 are about to attack him simultaneously
*Still standing over thug5, J spin kicks thug6 in the head
*In continuity of the first kick (he keeps spinning) J kicks out thug7’s legs from under him
*Thug7 tries to stand up
*Thug7 gets kneed in the side of the head by Doc (doesn’t see it coming)
*Thug8 tries to grab Doc from behind
*Doc catches thug8 by the wrists (thug8 is standing behind him, trying to wrap his arms around Doc’s head/neck)
*With both hands holding one arm, Doc turns around and head butts thug8
*Still holding the arm, Doc knees thug8 in the midsection like a motherfucker, who flies upward with his legs sprawled out
*Thug8 lands flat, face first onto the floor
*Doc holds the arm straight outward (upward) and stomps on thug8’s shoulder, dislocating it with a lever motion
*Having had enough of this bullshit, the rest of the thugs run out the front entrance to grab guns from their cars (the whole fight has not even lasted a minute yet, so it’s not like they were standing around waiting for their turn to fight. They were all rushing at once, but each one gets knocked out in the moment they reach J or Doc. Think of each panel as lasting only a second or two, with the following panel as the very next instant)
(Don’t draw them actually outside. It’s only implied that they’re getting guns, from J and Doc’s reaction)
*J and Doc duck behind the bar counter
*Thugs 9,10,11, and 12 barge in the front, thug9 with a TMP, thugs 10 and 12 with semi-auto pistols, thug11 with a revolver
*The thugs look nervously around
*Not seeing them, they all peer towards the bar
*They shoot up the bar counter, riddling it with bullet holes
(Thinking on this, I know gun fights don’t lend very well to the comic format, but I think we can come up with a creative solution)
*Thug9 cautiously approaches the bar (closer to the left side)
*The instant he gets close enough to check the other side >
*A knife is thrown into his neck, from the behind and to the right side of the bar (J-Bird did it. But don’t show him)
*Doc flips thug9 over the bar (from the front to the back of it. Don’t show Doc either, or maybe only his arms)
*Thugs 10, 11, and 12 reflexively fire at the bar again, but Doc is still out of their sight
*Abruptly, Doc stands straight up (facing them), holding the disarmed and badly injured thug9 as a shield in front of him
*Without a chance to think, the thugs fire a few shots but only hit thug9
*Doc aims the TMP over thug9’s right shoulder and takes out thug10 while thugs 11 and 12 run to cover (11 behind the stripper stage/podium and 12 around the corner of the entrance hallway)
*Panicking, thug11 hurriedly tries to reload his revolver
*Knowing full well that he’s reloading, and having discarded thug9’s body (now splayed over the counter), Doc confidently strides over towards thug11
*The instant thug11’s head is visible from behind the stage, doc takes him out with a quick and precise burst of the TMP (Perhaps an “over the shoulder” perspective would be best. But, feel free to take whatever freedoms aren’t specified here. Or even some that are) 
*Doc looks towards entrance corner>
*behind which thug12 stands nervously, unsure if he should flee at this point
*J-Bird now stands up from behind the bar with a bottle of grain alcohol, and a soaked rag protruding from it
*With a sloppy, sort of bored look that suggests he drank much of it, J ignites the Molotov cocktail
*Still standing behind the bar, J tosses it into the entrance hallway
*Thug12’s sleeve catches fire, which serves as a successful distraction
*Doc quickly steps around the corner and>
*takes out thug12 with another measured burst
(end comic portion)
After igniting a joint, J-Bird walked over to the injured leader lying on the floor next to the bar. Doc walked to the nearest unconscious thug. As J-Bird crouched down beside the leader, Doc took out the other mobster with a quick burst of the TMP. Smoke started to pour in to the room as the entranceway caught flame. J then removed the joint from his mouth after a deep drag. 
Doc executed the next thug.
Grabbing the injured gang leader by his hair, J held the joint a few inches from his eye. 
Doc executed another thug. 
“You know what to do” J said flatly as he lowered the joint to the gang leader’s eye.
“It’s Krunch!” The gang leader cried out before the joint reached him “He put the lean on Victor! He and his crew are holdin’ up in the top floor of the Continental.”
Having executed all but one, Doc approached the fallen bouncer. Doc nodded, allowing him to get up and limp out the back door. Flames were now engulfing the front entrance. 
Against his better judgment, and a little drunk from the grain alcohol, J gazed towards the flames. This time, J could tell they were real. He could feel the heat and smell the smoke emitting from them. Flames that he was responsible for.  Fire that threatened to consume and destroy everything that was beautiful in J’s eyes. 
	“Krunch” J repeated softly. 
	J stood up from the injured mobster. He and Doc walked to the rear exit as the fire ate the strip bar around them.



	J and Doc emerged from the rear entrance of the strip club. The door banged violently against the wall beside it. They walked quickly but did not run, looking cautiously from side to side for any remaining gangsters. Not seeing any, they turned the corner to find something even more upsetting. 
	On the street to the side of the club, their car was entirely ablaze. Apparently, those Amici thugs had made it when they had run out to grab their guns. The car burned vigorously beside the club which, of course, was equally aflame. For a single, somber moment, J and Doc stood on the side walk and reflected on how entirely fucked they were. It was oddly quiet, except for the moaning of the gang leader as he stumbled out the back, and collapsed next to a dumpster. 
	“Holy shit,” a high pitched voice caught their attention. “What the hell, guys?” Chi greeted the two startled men, walking up to them from across the street. 
	The three of them turned and headed quickly up the sidewalk and away from the flaming massacre. Looking incredulous, almost baffled, J kept his eyes on Ms. Chievous as they all fled. 
	“Didn’t we say three?” J finally asked her as they turned north. He kept his voice low and severe, but not aggressive “You got here pretty early. What a fucking coincidence.” 
	“Cool it, J” Doc spat, not standing for the accusation. 
	“I figured I’d catch you guys before the meet.” Chi explained. “There’s some pretty heavy stuff you need to know”
	“Let’s get the fuck out of dodge, at least” Doc urged of the two as they held their hurried, but inconspicuous, pace. “Before we get into that.”
	Walking for dozens of blocks, they now seemed a great distance from the billows of smoke that graced the sky behind them. But the smoke was still there, a tall, looming reminder of their doings. Block after block, J’s expression grew more and more severe. He fidgeted. He ran his hand over his scalp and gnashed his teeth. Slowing a bit, he fell a couple paces behind the other two. 
	“Jesus,” Doc broke the long silence, hardly moving his mouth. His eyes unwavering, he stared off to an impossible distance. He looked at the sky before him but did not see it. “Hard to believe things could get so massively fucked up in only a couple days. And here we are, on the street like a couple of assholes, hoping you don’t get spotted.”
	“Uh, Doc.” Chi interrupted him, halting in her tracks.
	Doc turned around. J-Bird was already a few steps into an adjacent liquor store. 
	“Ah, goddammit” Doc rolled his eyes with impatience.
	Doc and Chi went a couple paces into the alley beside the store to discuss their pertinent issues. Leaning against the brick wall, Doc tried to appear as inconspicuous as possible. 
	“I hate to put this on you. I know this is J’s mess.” Chi started, facing the same way as Doc. She spoke softly enough so that any passerby would be unable to discern her words, but loud enough so as to avoid suspicion. “But you guys got me in this, and now there’s four stiffs in my place. These two suits made the store and dropped them all, piled them up like they were garbage. Four innocent women, Doc.”
	Doc remained wordless.
	“And you were right. It is Krunch. I’ve got a bird in the Amici crew singin’ about how he showed up out the blue and muscled out the boss man.”
	“We know about Krunch. J got one of the dagos to spill it back at (*name of strip bar*)” Doc let out an almost inaudible sigh, flaring his nostrils, the only sign that he was unsettled by the news. “I’m sorry, Chi. I don’t know how yet. But we’ll do right by your people.”
	“You guys still got your own asses to worry about. I heard a song from the pig pen about the girl. They got to her too. Same as Tony. There’s a fed named Carter on J’s case who wrote it up this morning.”
	They heard the door open from around the front of the store. 
	“Krunch…that twisted fuck” Doc cursed to himself. It was a rare sight to see him lose his cool. “You better get out of here. Stay out of reach for a while. I’ll handle J.”
	With visible melancholy, Chi nodded before walking off. As she turned the corner away from the store, J walked into the alley nursing a fifth of whiskey. 
	“Where’s she off to?” J inquired dryly.
	“Krunch sent muscle to Chi’s place. They took out her people.” He paused. “And they got the girl too” Doc informed him. 
J pursed his brow. Bearing his teeth slightly, J looked up at the sky before taking another swig from the bottle. “How’d they do her?”
	Doc shook his head, looking down at the ground.
	Snarling, J turned away and stared at the opposite wall. For a moment, the two men stood in silence.
	“Go on, say it.” J antagonized, still facing away. He then looked over his shoulder and squinted at Doc. “Say you told me so” 
	Doc did not respond.
	“Tell me how I should have just done her myself: how that would have been smarter. Kinder even.”
	Doc stared back calmly, unmoving. He refused to meet J’s animosity. 
J started pacing around the alley. “Tell me how I was weak and how I fucked us both because of it.” He tilted his head back and guzzled the bottle as fast as one could poor it on the ground.
Doc rolled his eyes impatiently. “Jesus, man”
Was the fire spreading? J knew they had gotten far away from it by now. But somehow, he could still feel it. It was all over him. Too late for him to escape. He chucked the bottle, smashing it against the brick wall. 
“Here’s what happens now” J stopped pacing and looked Doc straight in the eyes. “The captain, Sabby, Fly, the Amici’s. The whole fucking lot of them. They think they’re safe up in their cozy suites: that only a fool, a fucking madman, would hit them there. Well, I’ll show them how right they are. I’ll gnaw their fucking arms before they drop me.” J’s rant was cut short as Doc slapped him hard across the face.
	“Let’s do this shit” Doc agreed.

Part III: Pero Malo
In front of that diner from before: 3:00PM, November 3rd
	Beat cop, Officer James O’Malley, stood on the street-adjacent edge of the sidewalk enjoying a cigarette. As of yet, this was the highlight of his otherwise dull and uneventful shift.  Nothing was going on. There was hardly anyone out in this part of the city. He took a deep drag and exhaled with his eyes closed, imagining himself elsewhere. 
	“Excuse me, officer” his peaceful trance was interrupted by a passing pedestrian “I’m from out of town. How do I get to Water Street from here?” The stranger asked.
	James stole another quick drag before answering. There was something peculiar about this man. Had he seen him before?
	“Water Street is First Street, so you gotta keep going east.” He informed the man while pointing in the respective direction. 
	“Thanks” the man replied.
	James went back to his daydreaming while the stranger headed east. 
	That is, until the stranger startled to circle back. He casually walked along the wall while James continued his blissful smoking near the edge of the street. The stranger then picked up an empty beer bottle from the ground. He approached James from behind and broke the bottle over his head. Quickly, he discarded the bottle neck and placed the cop in a sleeper hold. Oh shit, James thought. It’s totally that guy we’re looking for. Well, fuck me, he concluded while passing out. 
	Doc walked up to the cop and disarmed him, while J-Bird finished the maneuver. J lowered the unconscious officer down to the sidewalk. The cop’s gun in hand, Doc kept watch of their surroundings while J removed the cop’s uniform. 
	The customers sitting in the nearby diner could not believe what they were seeing. They gawked, dumbfounded in light of this outrageous event. 
	The two men began walking away from the naked cop as J buttoned up his new outfit. He curiously thumbed over the utility belt while crossing the street. After another block, they entered a gun store with J at the lead.
	“I’m sorry, sir” J greeted the manager while flashing the stolen badge “I’m afraid you can’t park there”
	The manager did not actually own a car, but he could not express this fact while J was tasing him. The only thing he could do was pass out from the shock. So he did.
Doc smashed the glass counter with the butt of the pistol. He tossed J a Beretta and grabbed a 12 gauge for himself before filling his coat pockets with ammunition.
	J holstered the pistol and walked behind the counter, stepping over the fallen manager, and headed towards the back room. Kicking the door open, he immediately spotted an M-16.
	“Oh, shit yes” He grabbed the rifle. “Thanks a bunch, my redneck friend” he saluted the drooling body. 
	Now properly tooled up, they walked out the store and looked over their surroundings. J walked out into the street and stood still in the middle of the intersection. A Camaro approached, slowing as it neared the faux policeman. 
	When the car came to a stop, J walked over to the driver side door. 
	“I need you to step out of the car, sir” J instructed the driver while walking up to him. “Now. Do it right now.” He said sternly.
	 Stunned, the driver did not know what to make of the disheveled cop holding an assault rifle. “Officer, what’s the meaning of th-” He began but was cut short when J hit him with the butt of the gun. 
	Doc walked around to the passenger side door as J pulled the unconscious body out through the window. 
	“Are you sure you’re ok to drive, man?” Doc asked with very legitimate cause for concern.
	“Don’t be ridiculous.” J assured him, bumping his head while getting into the driver’s seat. 
	Speeding away, Doc turned up the radio. Led Zeppelin’s When the Levee Breaks had just begun.



Suite on the top floor of the Continental Hotel: 4:25PM November 3rd
	“…A staggering ten bodies were found in (*name of the titty bar*) this afternoon…” The news woman boasted on the television.
	“Please enlighten me.” Frank Stephenson asked the mobster incredulously “How do eleven of our guys just up and vanish in one afternoon?”
	The gangster looked to his left, searching for an explanation that failed to present itself. He and Frank stood facing one another while Krunch leaned back in the couch behind them. Sabueso stood by the door, making sure the conversation was kept private. 
	“I don’t know, boss” The thug shuffled his feet, visibly unsettled. He was equal parts disgusted at having to answer to the crooked fed, and terrified of the two assassins. “They didn’t show at the rendezvous. So, we sent Donnie out to check their places. Didn’t find nobody. And the thing is, all the places looked straight: not like they skipped town or nothin”
	“Alright,” Krunch excused him “You can go. Swing by all the rooms. Tell the crews to stay put. I’m expecting company” 
	The gangster nodded eagerly. Not wasting a moment, he turned and headed out the door and down the hall.
	“Well, that’s just fucking fantastic.” Frank acknowledged “We gotta loose ship and maybe a goddam mutiny on our hands”
	“Nah, man” Sabueso corrected him “No way they skipped town. These goombahs know better than to bounce on us. They must’ve been hit.”
	“All in eleven in one afternoon?” Frank was taken aback by the suggestion.
	“Don’t you see,” Krunch interjected “Ten bodies at the (*name of titty bar*). That’s our eleven minus one who tells the tale.” Krunch withdrew a cigarette from his tuxedo pocket. He lit it, and inhaled before continuing “That means they’re onto us now.”
	“Pero Malo y Santo Bastardo” Sabueso cursed, quiet but venomous.
	“You’re shitting me?” Frank accused in outrage. He turned to Krunch. “How are you so sure?”
	“Because,” Krunch paused and, in that moment, Frank knew precisely how out of line he was “That’s how I taught them.”


Parking lot in front of the Continental hotel: 4:30PM, November 3rd
	J and Doc sat in the stolen Camaro preparing to invade Krunch’s stronghold. Plastic bags and hastily torn boxes were littered across the floor. Bones protruded from the graveyard of Styrofoam containers atop the dashboard. Exhaling a very sizeable toke, J squinted ponderously at the hotel as Doc cut the end off of a sparkler firework. 
	“Not bad for a final resting place.” J acknowledged while passing the roach of their final joint. He held his gaze through driver side window as he spoke “I must say, he might be the most rotten motherfucker I’ve ever worked with, but the captain sure has a fine sense of taste.” 
	“Can’t argue with that” Doc agreed while finishing his construction of the pipe grenade. He then ashed the joint. “I always thought boss man was awfully charming for a psychopath.”
	J gave a slight laugh. “I don’t know, man.” He took a slow, deliberate breath. His drunken, reflexive animosity from the (*strip club*) had since faded. Now calm and sure of himself, he reflected on the decisions that had brought him here, and began laughing in spite of them. “Say, do you think it’s too late for me to find Jesus?” he joked.
	“Yea, probably.” Doc played along. “Have you checked under the seat?”
	The two men shared a laugh before resolving themselves.
	“Alright. Seems like a good enough time to get killed.” J saluted while grabbing the rifle. He flung the door open and into the car beside them. 
	“As good as any, motherfucker.” Doc returned the sentiment, the twelve gauge already in hand. They exited the car and marched towards the hotel with haste and great purpose in their stride.
	 Stupefied behind the front counter, the manager gawked at the two men as they entered through the glass doors. He tried to speak but was unable to ask why the faux policeman was carrying an M-16, or why there was a dude with a shotgun. The two strange men walked past the counter without even acknowledging him. Now looking down at his feet, he was entirely unsure of how to handle this scenario. As such, he let them go into the elevator without so much as a greeting. 
	As the doors closed and the elevator began to ascend, the manager suddenly remembered something. Hurriedly, he picked up the phone. 
	“Hey, uhm. Agent Stevenson?” He nervously began “You said to call you if I saw anything strange come through the door. Well…uh…”
	
Krunch’s suite: 4:33PM, November 3rd
	“What?!” Frank yelled into the phone “An M-16?! What do they look like?!” His eyes widened as the manager informed him. His jaw dropped as he hung up. “They just got on the elevator.” He announced to the room.
	“They’re early” Krunch remarked without any visible excitement. 
	“Fuck me!” Frank was in outrage “I can’t be here for this!” He started pacing around the room. 
	Sabueso spoke through a wide grin “Looks like you are, fool” he corrected Frank while heading out of the room. 
	Knocking hard on the doors of each room as he walked by them, Sabueso alerted the deputies. Eight suited men rushed into the hallway with guns in hand. 
	“The elevator” Sabueso informed them plainly. He then backtracked down the hall and into his assigned position. 
	The assorted group of mobsters and crooked feds looked at one another with fearful contemplation. Mustering up their bravest game faces, they nodded in spite of this surreal moment before running towards the elevator. They turned the corner and into the next hallway. The sound of hushed panic and the loading of guns could be heard from nearby rooms as the other deputies made ready. 
	Four of the eight stayed on the far end of the hall, covering the other four as they circled the elevator. Staring down the sights of their pistols, they focused intently on the silver doors in anticipation of the fateful moment. Seconds stretched on into eternities as the “dings” became louder and louder. Maybe it was a false alarm. Maybe the manager made a mistake? Sweat was raining down their foreheads as the elevator finally arrived. 
	There was a moment of complete silence before the doors began to open. Guns at the ready, they braced themselves for the arrival of no one. The elevator was totally empty. That is, except for a soft hissing sound. Curiosity getting the better of him, the foremost gangster walked in to investigate. He looked to his right to find a strange device on the ground. But before he could discern what it was, he was already in several pieces. 
	Doc kicked open the stairway door to the left of the elevator. In two rapid successions of the shotgun, he took out the two nearby gangsters who weren’t killed by the pipe grenade. Squinting through the smoke, he fired his remaining shells at the four men down the hall. He then doubled back through the door to reload while J-Bird stormed into the hallway with his rifle at the ready. 
	“Four!” Doc yelled to him.
	Clearing past the smoke, J took out three wounded gangsters with short bursts of the M-16. Not seeing the fourth, J aimed the rifle at the far corner of the hallway and fired through the walls. A moan and a sudden thud could be heard from the other side. 	
	Doc caught up to J and they advanced to the end of the hall. They stopped right before the corner. 
	J put his hand on Doc’s shoulder before telling him “It’s like my granddad told me before those cops shot him down: You give a man a nigger, and he eats for a day. But if you teach a man to nigger, then he eats for a lifetime.” before barrel-rolling into the next hallway. 
	Expectedly, two thugs unloaded their pistols at J as he rolled. Rising to his knee, J fired his rifle and took them both out. He then looked down at himself and marveled that he had not been shot. 
	“I don’t think that’s how it goes.” Doc jested. 
	J went down the hall as Doc covered him from around the corner. It was now silent. A door on J’s left was wide open.
	From inside the room, four thugs held their guns at the open door. Wide eyed, they waited for the two assassins.
	J slowed a bit as he grew closer to the door, trying to more thoroughly observe his surroundings. His eyes panned very slightly from side to side. When he was a couple yards from the opening, the wooden floor let out a sharp creak beneath his foot. 
	Turning J’s strategy against him, the four thugs fired at his approximate location through the wall. As he turned to double back, a bullet grazed his face and ripped off part of his left cheek. J sprinted back and ducked around the corner.
	Wincing in spite of the wound, J reached his hand out towards Doc, signaling for their second and final pipe grenade. As he would only need a few seconds, J ripped off most of the sparkler fuse before lighting it. He stepped around the corner and tossed the pipe into the open doorway. 
	“OH SHI-” a gangster tried to say before dying spectacularly. 
	J and Doc hurried down the hall and into the room. Two of the thugs had been killed outright by the explosion. Another was incapacitated and the last was crawling towards his leg. Using the last of the M-16 ammunition, J finished them off and dropped the rifle. 
 	“Goddamn, dude” Doc remarked about J’s face wound. “Looks like you might have found him after all.”
	“Yea, right” J agreed while withdrawing the berretta. With his other hand, he took a swig from his flask to see if the whiskey would leak through his wound. It did, and it was gross.
	“Pero Malo!” they heard Sabueso yell out from somewhere nearby “Let’s settle this! Just you and me, motherfucker!” 
	Emerging from the mostly destroyed room, J and Doc headed further down the hall. 
	“Come on, Pero Malo. It’s about time I put you down.” Sabueso continued to taunt J-Bird “That’s why you’re here, no?” 
	Snarling rabidly, blood trickled off of J’s chin as he grimaced. They neared Sabueso’s room. 
	“Go on ahead.” J told Doc. “There’s still Fly and Krunch. I’ll take care of Sabby.”
	Doc nodded. He was shockingly graceful as he cartwheeled down the hall. 
	Bullets were fired through the wall as Doc went by Sabueso’s room, narrowly missing him. J heard four shots coming from only one gun. To J’s ears, the sound was unmistakable. It was the big ass Colt that Sabueso always carried. So, now there were only two shots left. 
	Blindly, J unloaded his berretta into the room, trying to goad Sabueso into firing the last two shots. Sabueso obliged. So, J sprinted into the room to find exactly what he had hoped for. On one knee, Sabueso was about to reload the revolver as he saw J pointing the berretta at his face. 
	“Drop it, Sabby” J demanded.
	Cocking a smile, Sabueso withdrew bullets from his tuxedo pocket. “As if you wouldn’t just waste me. You’re empty, puta.”
	J sped over and kicked Sabueso to his back. 
	“One last chance, motherfucker,” J implored. He stood over Sabueso, pointing the pistol at his forehead. “You deserve that much, but nothing more.”
	“I’ll take that chance” Sabueso replied.
	In his distress, J had made the foolish mistake of holding his gun too close to his enemy. Sabueso kicked upward, knocking the gun out of J’s hand

(start comic portion)
*In one continuous motion, Sabby takes out a big ass knife from his tuxedo jacket and slashes at J’s leg.
*J steps back, but not quick enough. His shin gets grazed by the blade. 
*J pulls out a similar knife of his own (they both have Brock Samson-esque hunting knives), while Sabby rises to his feet
*They assume proper knife fighting stances, while squinting at each other with looks like “you dirty motherfucker”
*J attacks with a sweeping downward slash
*Sabby moves just barely enough to dodge it, but his face shows calm deliberation. He knew exactly how much he had to sidestep, and didn’t bother to move any farther
*The knife now down and to Sabby’s right, J continues the attack with an upward diagonal slash, which Sabby readily blocks with his own knife
*J steps back, reassuming his stance. Sabby’s stance is now more relaxed than it was initially, his confidence growing.
*J throws a downward diagonal slash (Sabby’s upper left to lower right)>
*which Sabby simultaneously dodges by matrixing to his left and swiping at J’s attacking arm as it passes over him
*J double’s back again, wincing from the cut on the side of his forearm.
*Close up on J’s face. He knows he’s outmatched, but there is no visible fear. There is a look of deep contemplation behind his grimacing game face. 
Still in comic format, cut to Doc whose further down the hall
*Doc approaches another open door, walking slowly along the adjacent wall
*Fly stands just around the corner, in the room, with his pistol ready.
*Just before Doc reaches the doorway, (with a perspective from the opposite side of the door, in the hallway) both Doc and Fly are shown as only a couple feet from one another. Their expressions are very severe, but not at all frightened. They know fully well that the other is just around the corner, about to fuck their shit up, and they accept whatever fate may come
*The barrel of Doc’s shotgun becomes visible in the doorway
*Fly kicks it, dislodging it from Doc’s hands
*Fly turns the corner and points his gun up at Doc’s face
*Just before he can line up the shot, Doc grabs his wrist
*Doc moves it to the side as Fly fires, the bullet hits the wall, showing a trajectory that was merely an inch from Doc’s head
*With the hand on the wrist, Doc grabs Fly’s arm with his other hand. He hyperextends it into a standing arm bar
*They struggle in the position for a moment, Fly trying to pull his arm away and dragging Doc into the room. 
*Doc tries to pry the gun from Fly’s extended arm
*Realizing his vulnerability, Fly flicks his wrist and throws the gun away
*Using the moment that Doc looks at where the gun landed as a distraction, Fly bull-rushes him towards a wall (they’re in the room)
*Doc’s head bangs off the wall
*Taking advantage of Doc’s momentary disorientation, Fly frees himself from the arm bar
*Fly punches Doc in the face
*Doc tries to regain himself in the consequent haziness, backing away from Fly and towards the center of the room
*Fly front kicks Doc in his mothafuckin’ chest
*Doc flies back and through a glass coffee table
*Not wasting a moment, Fly runs toward Doc as Doc begins to get up
*Attempting to kick Doc’s head like a soccerball (Doc is on his hands and knees at the moment), Fly’s kick narrowly misses as Doc catches the leg
*Using Fly’s forward momentum, and leverage from Fly’s leg, Doc flips Fly down onto his stomach (Doc stands up in the same movement)
*Doc attempts an ankle bar *Just as Doc applies the torque, Fly uses the force from Doc’s maneuver to help twist himself onto his back
*Doc now off balance, Fly (still from his back) pulls Doc towards him
*Fly uses both his legs to flip Doc over his head
*However, Doc goes with it and flips so much that he lands on his feet
*Not expecting such cat-like agility, Fly (now standing) turns to face Doc and is shocked>
*to get sidekicked in his mothafuckin’ chest
*Fly flies back and hits against the wall
*Doc uses the momentary reprieve to regain his stoic composure
*Visibly angry, Fly rises to his feet and>
*takes off his tuxedo jacket and tie
*They assume proper fighting stances
*Now done with the foreplay, Doc and Fly circle and size each other up (some real cinematic shit)
*Fly throws a jab, Doc sidesteps
*Another jab, Doc sidesteps (Doc’s facial expression illustrates his patience)
*Anticipating Fly’s timing, Doc simultaneously dodges the next jab and connects with a jab of his own
*Blood trickles from Fly’s mouth, and his face contorts with frustration
*Fly throws>
*a few>
*haymakers>
*and manages to land one on Doc’s temple
*Dazed, Doc steps back
*Fly throws a round kick into Doc’s side, breaking a rib
*The pain bringing back his clarity, Doc jumps over a low spin kick that Fly throws and>
*ducks under a second high spin kick (the inverse of J-Bird’s double spin kick in the strip club). While ducking, Doc winds up his own high spin kick which>
*connects with Fly’s face,>
*twisting Fly backward and dropping him to his knees
*Doc grabs Fly’s head from behind, trying to break his neck
*Too strong and resilient, Fly stands up and fights off the attempt, elbowing Doc in the broken rib
*Fly twists around and>
*Head butts the shit out of Doc
*Fly leans back for a second head butt
*As Fly attacks, Doc (with his hand now on the back of Fly’s neck) pushes Fly’s head down and out of the line of fire, using Fly’s forward momentum to increase the damage done by a knee to Fly’s ribs.
*Doubled over by the knee, with his shoulder against Doc’s stomach, Fly drives Doc into the wall behind him
*Again freeing himself from Doc’s deadly grasp, he uses the precious opportunity to>
*punch
*the fuck
*out of Doc’s face
*Bleeding and nearly unconscious (his back being pressed against the wall), Doc just manages to grab Fly’s head and pull it towards his own shoulder (to take away the power from his punches).
*Through shear, desperate will power, Doc grabs hold of Fly and manages to gain leverage 
*Putting his right leg behind Fly’s right leg (they’re both still facing each other)>
*Doc tosses the fuck out of Fly (It’s a specific move I learned. It’s like a reverse “Dimart thow”, with the dude’s back against your side instead of his stomach. You kind of toss the fucker like a frisbee)
*Fly lands on his head
*Fly, very much disoriented, slowly rises to his knees
*Again, Doc attempts to break Fly’s neck
*Fly stuggles to the bitter end while>
*Doc wins the struggle
*Breaking Sweet’s neck while simultaneously collapsing from the strain of his efforts
*Doc lies on his back, eyes closed
(Cut back to J. His cop shirt is cut up a little, and he has a few wounds that show he’s been losing)
*Sabby switches to western grip, and goes on the offensive
*Sabby throws a downward slash (Compared to J’s swipes, which are broader, his are narrower and more controlled). J barely moves out of the way, with his face indicating the fullest of his effort
*Having closed some distance, Sabby throws a horizontal slash at J’s throat, which J can only dodge by throwing himself wildly backward
*Ultra-close up, showing the blade shaving some stubble from under J’s chin
*Falling backward, J catches himself on his left hand and>
*back flips while Sabby lunges forward
*Crouching slightly, partly off balance from the flip, J holds his knife defensively in front of his head while Sabby stabs directly towards it
*J deflects the attack, but just barely enough to save himself. (J’s blade is pressed against Sabby’s) Sabby’s knife grazes the top of J’s shoulder
*Struggling in this position for an instant, (Both knives are just above J’s right shoulder, with J’s keeping Sabby’s from coming sideways and cutting his neck) J gets crazy eyes and>
*Throws the tips of his left index and middle fingers at Sabby’s throat
*Clutching his own throat, gasping for air, Sabby doubles back while J (whose back is now against the counter that divides the living area from the kitchen area) backflips over the counter (Admittedly not the most rational move, but the blood loss from his various wounds is making him kind of delirious. J intends to die back flipping like a son of a bitch)
*Sabby advances while J opens the minibar
*Before Sabby can get around the counter (he’s running around the side, like a fucking amateur)>
*J chucks one of those tiny hotel bottles at him, hitting him in the shoulder
*Sabby bears the pain and keeps advancing until>
*The next bottle hits him in the nuts
*Sabby backs up into the living area. J drinks the next bottle before>
*Throwing it and hitting Sabby in the temple
*Realizing the advantage is now his (but still pretty goddamn insane) J gets up on the counter and>
*Hits Sabby with a flying drop kick
*Sabby lands on his back. J lands in a crouch
*J pounces>
*attempting to stab Sabby in the heart, but Sabby catches J by the knife hand just before the knife can touch him
*J grabs Sabby’s knife hand as well, pushing it down to Sabby’s side
*J puts his own chest against the butt of his knife, using his body weight to press the knife down toward Sabby’s sternum. J is sprawling over Sabby to maximize the force he can push down with.
*Sabby tries to knee J in the nuts, but J anticipates the move and shimmies to one side, but>
*Sabby uses J’s movement to his own advantage. He quickly shifts to his side while letting J’s blade stab into the ground
*Abandoning the effort, J stands up, pulling Sabby along with him (Sabby is pulled up to a standing position, with his momentum towards J. They’re both still holding the other by the knife hands)
*J uses the momentum to knee the holy dog shit out of Sabby’s solar plexus
*Ok here’s the move: So they’re both standing up, with a firm hold of the other by the knife hand. J realizes that this position is a stalemate. They could stand like that all day, kneeing and head butting the fuck out of one another. But, J doesn’t work by the hour. So, he flings his own knife directly upward into the air while crossing his left hand (still holding Sabby’s knife(right) hand) over or to his own right side, directly under the trajectory of the airborne knife. J then grabs Sabby’s knife hand with his now free right hand while letting go of it with his left. So at this instant, Sabby’s left is holding J’s right (which was J’s knife hand) and Sabby’s knife/right hand is held by J’s right. Since Sabby is bent over from the knee to his midsection, he does not see the knife being thrown (Although the whole move is only like two seconds anyway). J catches the knife with his free left hand and stabs down into Sabby’s back
*J twists the blade, making Sabby relinquish the knife
(*end comic portion*)

	J stood up, discarding Sabueso’s knife and sheathing his own. Exasperated from the fight, he breathed heavily as he walked over to the side of the room where his pistol had landed. 
	“Fuck you” Sabueso choked. He lied on his side, blood pooling underneath him. “Of course you would stab me in the back, rat fuck that you are.” His voice became weaker as the pool spread out. “Now I die with loyalty. With honor. While you carry this with you.”
	“You just don’t get it, Sabby” J said as he picked up the berretta. There was no hate in his voice. There was no anger. “Those two are not the same.” He turned around and pointed the pistol. 
	Sabueso could see the sadness and dead certainty in J-Bird’s eyes, and in that moment, he understood. He smiled in spite of himself. “Pero Bueno” he saluted before J shot him with the last bullet in the clip. 
	Oh shit, oh shit, oh shit. The last remaining deputy retreated down the hall. He turned into Krunch’s room, slammed the door shut, and fell to his knees. This is it, this is it! Despite his best efforts, he began sobbing wildly. 
	Halfway through a cigarette, Krunch looked out the window. The sun had just lowered to the horizon. The sky was a fierce and glorious amber. “What is the meaning of this?” Krunch asked the man without turning away from the gorgeous scene. His voice was just above a whisper. 
	“I’m sorry, boss” the man cried out. “They got everybody. The whole crew is wiped out.” He faced the carpet, shaking uncontrollably. An unholy mixture of fear and shame took hold of him. How could he abandon his crew like that? Suddenly, he felt a hand on his right shoulder. 
	“Stand up, son” Krunch told him gently. 
	The gangster managed to erect himself and face the old killer. His panic began to subside when he saw the calm and almost compassionate expression on Krunch’s face.
	“What’s your name?” Krunch asked earnestly. 
	“Ryan” He answered. “Ryan Aleo” 
	“I’m sorry, Ryan” Krunch told him sincerely “Looks like this is it for us”
	Ryan looked down as his panic began to surge once more. 
	“No, look at me. You can’t turn away. There’s no use”
	Ryan willed himself to face Krunch.
	“We can’t do anything about it. Our only choice is how to face it. I know you’re afraid, Ryan. There’s nothing wrong with that. I’m terribly afraid, myself. I always am.”
	Taking a deep breath, Ryan stopped shaking and wiped away his tears. 
	“Death is right outside that door. Now, are you going to run and hide from it like a fool? Just so it can stab you in the back. Or are you going to go out there and tell it to fuck off?”
	Ryan nodded emphatically. He turned and opened the door. 
	Krunch doubled back as his deputy left the room. He strolled towards the fireplace, the wood crackling in wake of the aggressive flames. Above it, a samurai sword was decoratively mounted. Krunch ran his fingers along the sheath, admiring the work of art. Indeed, it was finer than any he would ever see. With a deep breath, he put an end to his indulgence and headed towards the desk.
 	After retrieving the sawed off 12 gauge, he took hold of the chair. His hand pressed against the dark brown leather as he dragged it to the center of the room. It really was a fine chair. He faced it towards the door and drew deeply from his cigarette as he sat down. A solitary gunshot rang out from the hallway, followed by a guttural yelp from Ryan. Krunch leaned back in the chair, aiming both the sawed off and his desert eagle at the open door. Then, he waited. 
	Smoke eased out of Krunch’s nostrils. The cigarette hung loosely from the corner of his mouth. He was entirely still, listening intently but not eagerly. The desperate and deadly circumstances did nothing to change his demeanor. Death was a welcome bedfellow. 
	The floor creaked from the hallway. It was distant, not yet in front of the room. Krunch exhaled slowly and silently. He moved the cigarette around with his mouth. Another creak from the hallway. It was close, but not quite close enough. A few more moments. The very slightest of smirks appeared across his face. There was only seconds left. If he didn’t manage to kill his two former partners, they would surely gun him down. It really was a beautiful moment. 
	Another creak. Now. Krunch fired the desert eagle in five rapid successions. Precisely, he left a cross shape along the wall, centered a few feet to the right of the open doorway. There was a low grunting sound out in the hallway. Then, something dropped to the floor with a conspicuous thud. Silence. After a moment, Krunch saw blood spreading in front of the doorway. 
	Both guns at the ready, he stood up from the chair and cautiously approached the opening. Nothing made a sound. He saw the blood spread further, soaking into the carpet. Whoever he had shot, be it J-Bird or Doc, they were likely down for the count. Krunch kept his eyes locked on the lower right corner of the doorway. Impatient, he urged to see the body of his fallen opponent. He was few feet from the door when he could see the arm. Gripped firmly in his left hand, the pistol butted into the hallway as the face became visible. Ah, fuck me. It was Ryan.
(*start comic portion*)

*With a perspective from the floor and against the opposite wall, we see J-Bird spidermaning above the doorway. He is glaring at Krunch’s pistol. His hands are pressed against the wall on Krunch’s side. Krunch is facing down, looking mildly upset over his mistake. 
*With a perspective from over Krunch’s left shoulder, J grabs the pistol hand (Krunch’s left with J’s right) as he begins to drop down
*J breaks Krunch’s wrist (bending it downward) as his feet land on the floor. J’s expression shows that he is surprised to see Krunch holding the sawed off in his other hand (as of now, Krunch is pointing it from the hip). Krunch does not let go of the pistol.

(By the way, Krunch’s shotty is like this. So it’s got two shots before it has to be reloaded.)
*Turning to his side (trying to present his right shoulder to Krunch), J leans back and starts to pull Krunch into the hallway by the wrist as Krunch fires the sawed off, hitting J in the left (far) shoulder. Most of the pellets go into J’s armor (remember he has the cop getup). 
*With a perspective from the hallway, a couple yards to Krunch’s right, Krunch is pulled out into the hallway and into Doc’s line of fire. 
*Still being pulled forward and downward, Krunch aims his sawed off in perfect line with Doc’s 12 gauge. The ends of the barrels are only a few inches apart. (Perhaps a view that’s perpendicular to the shotgun line would be best)

*Krunch fires>
*The 12 gauge gets knocked out of Doc’s hands and Doc gets some pellets in the right arm. He winces accordingly. Now lying back against the wall and floor, J (still holding Krunch’s left wrist with his right, so Krunch is like hunched over him a little) unsheathes his knife with a rabid snarl on his face.
*As J starts to stab up toward Krunch>
*Krunch swings the shotty back (it’s coming from pointing at doc) and knocks the knife out of J’s hand. 
*Then, with a backhand motion, Krunch coldcocks the shit out of J-Bird with the barrel of the sawed off. “I wouldn’t expect someone of your generation to understand. Kariya Kagetoki hasn’t lifted a sword in ages because there hasn’t been anyone worthy enough to face him. He was known as the hand of God.”
*Doc bends down to pick up the 12 gauge.
*As Doc lays his left hand on it, a close up shows that the gun has been disabled from Krunch’s shot. (The cocking mechanism is blown off or something)
*(Looking up as if we’re in J-Bird’s position) His left hand now free, Krunch tries to aim the desert eagle at J’s head. His wrist is so fucked up, that he has to hold his arm at a weird angle 
*Doc kicks the pistol out of Krunch’s hand. 
*Doc swings the butt of the 12 gauge, knocking the sawed off out Krunch’s other hand (Krunch’s right hand. It’s down by his side. Doc is holding the 12 gauge like a cop would butt someone in the gut, except he’s swinging instead of lunging).
*Krunch grabs Doc’s 12 gauge with both hands to keep Doc from swinging it again. 

 *With a perspective from just inside the room, Doc and Krunch are struggling for leverage, with all hands on the 12 gauge between them. Doc’s right arm is bloodied and Krunch’s left wrist is crooked and twisted up. J is slouched back against the wall and floor, teetering on unconsciousness from the coldcocking.
*Krunch head-butts Doc (now’s probably a good time to mention that Krunch is kind of tall. He’s got a few inches on Doc.) 
*Krunch uses the moment of Doc’s imbalance to throw/push him against the wall by torqueing the 12 gauge accordingly.

*Krunch presses the 12 gauge against Doc’s throat, trying to choke him
*Close up on Doc struggling, trying to push the gun back
*Delirious, J looks through one half open eye at the melee. His mouth is half open, bleeding and drooling and shit. A goddamn mess.
*Still in the slouching position, J kicks Krunch in the back of the knee, causing him to bend back and lose his superior position.
*Doc takes advantage and pushes Krunch to the ground. Krunch lands on his back next to J-Bird.
*Mounted over Krunch, Doc tries to choke him with the 12 gauge. J-Bird is looking confusedly over towards our perspective (which is from the door). He’s totally out of it. 
*From J-Bird’s perspective, we see to the fireplace in Krunch’s suite. 
*Close up on J’s face. He widens his eyes slightly (They were barely open) and stares at us (at the fire) as if he can hardly tell where he is. 
*J starts to crawl towards the room. Doc looks over his shoulder at him (still struggling to hold the barrel against Krunch’s throat) like “what the fuck are you doing?”
*Still crawling and leaving a trail of blood drops, J is a few feet into the room and headed straight towards the fire. 
* He falls face down on the floor, eyes closed, passed out. 

*Doc’s superior position starts to win out. The barrel is pressed firmly against Krunch’s throat now. 
*With desperation, Krunch lets go with his injured hand and drives his thumb into one of Doc’s pellet wounds. (Krunch’s left hand and Doc’s right forearm). 
*Doc flinches, pulling back slightly.
*Krunch pulls Doc’s forearm down so that the side of the barrel to the left of his (Krunch’s) neck hits the ground, and pushes up with his right hand on the other side.
*Krunch uses this motion to flip Doc off of him and to his (Krunch’s) left side. Their hands have returned to their former positions on the shotgun. 
*They rise to crouching positions (like catchers in baseball), with the gun at an equal distance between them
*Close up on Krunch’s face. 
*Close up on Doc’s face. They are both calm. 
*They do the exact same move, front kicking each other in the face
*They fly apart, both letting go of the shotgun. 
*They both land on their backs, in roughly the same (inversed) positions, wincing as their heads bounce off the ground. 

*Krunch sits up and regains his composure. Doc is a moment slower in the same effort. 
*Krunch looks over his shoulder turns around, still sitting. He sees the pistol behind him. 
*Doc can’t quite get up to a sitting position. He appears dazed. 
*Krunch turns around and grabs the pistol (right hand) while crouching (facing his end of the hallway). 
*A slight smirk appears across his face
*Krunch stands up (still facing the same way).
*Aiming from the hip, he turns to face Doc but instead>
*Is very much surprised to see J-Bird about to slash him with the samurai sword. The far half of the blade is bright orange, indicating that J held it in the fire. 
*J-Bird cuts off Krunch’s right hand. Krunch has a very appropriate look on his face. Specifically: “Ow! Fuck! My hand!”
*Close up on the hand landing on the floor, the gun bouncing out of it
*J kicks the fuck out of Krunch’s knee, dropping him. 
*Perspective from the opposite side of the hallway, with all three of them in view. Doc is facing away from us (towards the others) in a Buddha-like sitting position. J is standing turned to the side, his back near the suite side wall and the sword hanging lazily in his right hand (nearer us. The orange tip is against the ground).  Krunch is on his knees, facing our way with a murderous rage. 

 (end comic portion)

	“Hold still, motherfucker” J-Bird spat “You don’t want me to make a mess of this” With a grasp on Krunch’s wrist, he pressed the flat of the sword against the bleeding stump. The sound of Krunch’s whaling served to deafen that of his flesh searing upon the glowing metal. Once the wound was cauterized, J-Bird completed the procedure with a swift knee to Krunch’s jaw. The one handed assassin fell to the floor with a loud thud. 
	“Goddamn” Doc proclaimed without any emphasis. With his good hand, he caught Krunch’s pack of cigarettes as J tossed them over. Now that the battle had ceased, they could very clearly hear sirens outside, as well as the lower floors being evacuated. “I guess they didn’t kill us.” Doc ignited a cigarette.
	“Unfortunately” smoke poured from J-Bird’s nostrils. “At least the captain will finally get his.” J nodded towards their unconscious former partner. “Just imagine how he’ll fair in the pen. The Amici’s, the Santiago’s, the Labradas. We went after all of them, didn’t we? They’ll all want their chunk of the boss man.” J took a deep drag and tilted his head back. Smoke escaped from his face wound. “That sure puts a smile on this half face of mine.” 
	“Well. Peace, man”
 	“Actually, wait.” J dryly interrupted the farewell, almost bored. 
	“Huh?” Doc took the pistol out of his mouth. 
	“I think we might have a move here.” 
	J walked into the suite and looked over the room. Doc followed only after a considerable pause, having had his heart set on a quick and rapeless death. After turning on the TV, J picked up and dialed the phone. 
	“Come on. Answer, you fuck” J said to no one as the phone rang. 
	As J had suspected, the hotel was on the news. Cop cars surrounded the building on all sides and choppers graced the sky above them. Doc went to check the bathroom, but found the door locked. 
	“Hey, Tom.” J greeted Tom Brannock. 
	Doc kicked open the bathroom door, revealing a man tied up on the floor.
	“My good friend, Sargent Brannock. Sorry for being so curt, but it’s time I collected that bill, Sarge.” 
	Doc removed the gag from the bound man. J continued his conversation. 
	“Oh, thank God. Those guys took me hostage.” The man rejoiced “I thought I’d nev-” his  celebration was cut short by Doc’s backhand. 
	“Hey, J” Doc called over his shoulder “This is that fed, right? Steve or something?”
	J leaned over “Yea. Stevenson” before going back to his conversation. 
	Never before had Frank’s smirk been wiped away so effectively. The acceleration from great relief to terror was near enough to drop his face on the tile beneath him. 
	“Tough break, fool” Doc almost sympathized with Frank, but instead, slapped him again. 
	“Yea, now. As in right now.” J argued over the phone. “Where, you ask?” He looked from the TV to the window. “I take it you haven’t seen the news?”

The parking lot in front of the Continental Hotel: 4:54PM, November 3rd
	“Ok, I gotcha, pal.” The negotiator spoke reassuringly into the pay phone (I’m picturing like dog day afternoon or something. I don’t think they would use a pay phone, but whatever. It can be smoothed over.) “Nobody else has to get hurt. We read you loud and clear.” He then hung up. 
	“What’s their game?” Sargent Oscar Ramirez asked of the negotiator. 
	“Somehow, they got their hands on a fed. He identifies himself as Frank Stevenson and says they’re holding him at gunpoint. Says if we make a move, yahdah, yahdah, they drop him.”
	“Naturally” Ramirez responded, expectedly unbothered.
	“…Sargent, we have visual on the targets. Repeat. We have visual on the targets. Two perps, one hostage. Over…” Ramirez was radioed by a chopper. 
	“Be advised, the hostage is a federal agent.” Ramirez answered back. “Do not engage. Repeat. Do not engage.” 
	
On the roof of the Continental Hotel: 4:56PM, November 3rd
	With his hands still bound behind his back, Frank was ushered through the steel door at the behest of Krunch’s sawed off, which was now in J’s possession. Doc followed close behind with an AK-47 in hand, having retrieved it from a felled deputy. The three men walked gingerly out onto the rooftop, scanning their surroundings. 
	“I bet it takes all of thirty seconds before our heads are in pieces.” Doc remarked. 
	“We should be so lucky” J laughed. 
	“So help me if you fuck this up, Hank” Doc threatened with a purely matter-of-fact tone of voice.
	“It’s Frank, actually” Frank argued. 
	“It’s whatever the fuck I say it is, Dicklips” Doc corrected him, maintaining his calm voice. “I’m sure you know by now: we’re not fond of being fucked with. Not by Krunch. And certainly not by a shit heel rat.” 
	“I sort of got that vibe, yea” Frank dared. By now, he was starting to reason that they needed him: to ward off the cops at least. He gambled at getting them to lose their cool and make a mistake. But of course, he failed to see how profoundly retarded that plan was. 
	Walking in tight formation and making sure to keep their heads close to one another’s, the three men approached the southern side of the building. In this direction was the nearest police helicopter, maintaining its position at roughly a hundred yards off
	
	 “Targets are approaching the south face of the building.” Officer Riley radioed to Sargent Ramirez. The pilot swiveled slightly, providing Riley with a better shot. “We have a shot. Repeat. We have a shot. Over.” 
	“…That’s a negative. Do not engage…” Ramirez radioed back.  
	The two officers looked on as the targets came to the edge of the building. The hostage stood right up against the waist high border while the faux cop kept a hand cannon at the back of his head. The man in the utility jacket came up to the border alongside the hostage, holding the rifle by his waist. Then, in a swift and purposeful maneuver, the two perps ducked beside the border. The faux cop kept his weapon directed at the hostage, who remained standing, while the rifleman took aim over the border. 
	“Oh, fuck me.” Riley reacted rightfully. 
	The rifleman opened fire on the chopper. Bullets riddled against the side of it. One tore through Riley’s shin. Reflexively, he answered back with his AR-15. The hostage cried out and toppled over.
	“Agh!” Riley gnashed his teeth. He squeezed his wounded leg as the chopper retreated. “Bullshit!” 
	“…Fall back. Repeat. Fall back…” Ramirez voiced over the radio “…Swat has arrived. They’ll take it from here. Maintain a safe distance…” 
	“Way fucking ahead of you.” The pilot muttered to himself. Looking over his shoulder, the targets fell out sight and into the evening sun as he flew out of the rifle’s range. 

	“Good job, Hank” Doc commended Frank for his performance. “They ate that shit right up.” 
	The three of them slouched back against the border. 
	“You said you weren’t gonna hit them!” Frank bitched. 
	“No. Bird said I wasn’t gonna hit them. I made no such agreement” Doc lit up another cigarette.
	J-Bird shrugged his shoulders, pulling a tooth fragment out of his nightmarish cheek. He examined it with infantile curiosity, not entirely sure of where he was or what he was doing. Leaning further back against the border, J’s eyelids grew heavy. He silently mouthed words and began a conversation with the arc angel, Saint Michael. The saint told him awesome tales. Like how he led the army of heaven against Lucifer, dropkicking the motherfucker into eternal damnation. J-Bird thought that was fucking rad. So you’re, like, the O.G. angel? Just chilling with God since before anything? Tits. Saint Michael did not take kindly to J’s unseemliness. He opted to bitch slap the two bit thug, as he is wont to do. 
	“Dude, cut the shit” Doc slapped J-Bird again. 
